Florida, session 2026, HB769.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
158
159 Section 1. Sections 627.730, 627.731, 627.7311, 627.732,
160 627.733, 627.734, 627.736, 627.737, 627.739, 627.7401, 627.7403,
161 and 627.7405, Florida Statutes, are repealed.
162 Section 2. Section 627.7407, Florida Statutes, is
163 repealed.
164 Section 3. Paragraph (e) of subsection (2) of section
165 316.2122, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
166 316.2122 Operation of a low-speed vehicle, mini truck, or
167 low-speed autonomous delivery vehicle on certain roadways.—
168 (2) The operation of a low-speed autonomous delivery
169 vehicle on any road is authorized with the following
170 restrictions:
171 (e) A low-speed autonomous delivery vehicle must be
172 covered by a policy of automobile insurance which provides the
173 coverage required by s. 627.749(2)(a)1. and, 2., and 3. The
174 coverage requirements of this paragraph may be satisfied by
175 automobile insurance maintained by the owner of a low-speed
Page 7 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
176 autonomous delivery vehicle, the owner of the teleoperation
177 system, the remote human operator, or a combination thereof.
178 Section 4. Subsection (1) of section 316.646, Florida
179 Statutes, is amended to read:
180 316.646 Security required; proof of security and display
181 thereof.—
182 (1) A Any person required by s. 324.022, s. 324.023, s.
183 324.032, s. 627.7415, s. 627.742, s. 627.748, or s. 627.7483 to
184 maintain liability security for property damage, liability
185 security, required by s. 324.023 to maintain liability security
186 for bodily injury, or death, or required by s. 627.733 to
187 maintain personal injury protection security on a motor vehicle
188 shall have in his or her immediate possession at all times while
189 operating a such motor vehicle proper proof of maintenance of
190 the required security.
191 (a) Such proof must shall be in a uniform paper or
192 electronic format, as prescribed by the department, a valid
193 insurance policy, an insurance policy binder, a certificate of
194 insurance, or such other proof as may be prescribed by the
195 department.
196 (b)1. The act of presenting to a law enforcement officer
197 an electronic device displaying proof of insurance in an
198 electronic format does not constitute consent for the officer to
199 access any information on the device other than the displayed
200 proof of insurance.
Page 8 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
201 2. The person who presents the device to the officer
202 assumes the liability for any resulting damage to the device.
203 Section 5. Paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of section
204 318.18, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
205 318.18 Amount of penalties.—The penalties required for a
206 noncriminal disposition pursuant to s. 318.14 or a criminal
207 offense listed in s. 318.17 are as follows:
208 (2) Thirty dollars for all nonmoving traffic violations
209 and:
210 (b) For all violations of ss. 320.0605, 320.07(1),
211 322.065, and 322.15(1). A Any person who is cited for a
212 violation of s. 320.07(1) must shall be charged a delinquent fee
213 pursuant to s. 320.07(4).
214 1. If a person who is cited for a violation of s. 320.0605
215 or s. 320.07 can show proof of having a valid registration at
216 the time of arrest, the clerk of the court may dismiss the case
217 and may assess a dismissal fee of up to $10, from which the
218 clerk shall remit $2.50 to the Department of Revenue for deposit
219 into the General Revenue Fund. A person who finds it impossible
220 or impractical to obtain a valid registration certificate must
221 submit an affidavit detailing the reasons for the impossibility
222 or impracticality. The reasons may include, but are not limited
223 to, the fact that the vehicle was sold, stolen, or destroyed;
224 that the state in which the vehicle is registered does not issue
225 a certificate of registration; or that the vehicle is owned by
Page 9 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
226 another person.
227 2. If a person who is cited for a violation of s. 322.03, s.
228 322.065, or s. 322.15 can show a driver license issued to him or
229 her and valid at the time of arrest, the clerk of the court may
230 dismiss the case and may assess a dismissal fee of up to $10,
231 from which the clerk shall remit $2.50 to the Department of
232 Revenue for deposit into the General Revenue Fund.
233 3. If a person who is cited for a violation of s. 316.646
234 can show proof of security as required by s. 324.021(7) s.
235 627.733, issued to the person and valid at the time of arrest,
236 the clerk of the court may dismiss the case and may assess a
237 dismissal fee of up to $10, from which the clerk shall remit
238 $2.50 to the Department of Revenue for deposit into the General
239 Revenue Fund. A person who finds it impossible or impractical to
240 obtain proof of security must submit an affidavit detailing the
241 reasons for the impracticality. The reasons may include, but are
242 not limited to, the fact that the vehicle has since been sold,
243 stolen, or destroyed; that the owner or registrant of the
244 vehicle is not required by s. 627.733 to maintain personal
245 injury protection insurance; or that the vehicle is owned by
246 another person.
247 Section 6. Paragraphs (a) and (d) of subsection (5) of
248 section 320.02, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
249 320.02 Registration required; application for
250 registration; forms.—
Page 10 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
251 (5)(a) Proof that bodily injury liability coverage and
252 property damage liability coverage personal injury protection
253 benefits have been purchased if required under s. 324.022, s.
254 324.032, or s. 627.742 s. 627.733, that property damage
255 liability coverage has been purchased as required under s.
256 324.022, that bodily injury liability or death coverage has been
257 purchased if required under s. 324.023, and that combined bodily
258 liability insurance and property damage liability insurance have
259 been purchased if required under s. 627.7415 must shall be
260 provided in the manner prescribed by law by the applicant at the
261 time of application for registration of any motor vehicle that
262 is subject to such requirements. The issuing agent may not shall
263 refuse to issue registration if such proof of purchase is not
264 provided. Insurers shall furnish uniform proof-of-purchase cards
265 in a paper or electronic format in a form prescribed by the
266 department and include the name of the insured's insurance
267 company, the coverage identification number, and the make, year,
268 and vehicle identification number of the vehicle insured. The
269 card must contain a statement notifying the applicant of the
270 penalty specified under s. 316.646(4). The card or insurance
271 policy, insurance policy binder, or certificate of insurance or
272 a photocopy of any of these; an affidavit containing the name of
273 the insured's insurance company, the insured's policy number,
274 and the make and year of the vehicle insured; or such other
275 proof as may be prescribed by the department constitutes shall
Page 11 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
276 constitute sufficient proof of purchase. If an affidavit is
277 provided as proof, it must be in substantially the following
278 form:
279
280 Under penalty of perjury, I ...(Name of insured)... do hereby
281 certify that I have ...(bodily injury liability and Personal
282 Injury Protection, property damage liability, and, if required,
283 Bodily Injury Liability)... insurance currently in effect with
284 ...(Name of insurance company)... under ...(policy number)...
285 covering ...(make, year, and vehicle identification number of
286 vehicle).... ...(Signature of Insured)...
287
288 Such affidavit must include the following warning:
289
290 WARNING: GIVING FALSE INFORMATION IN ORDER TO OBTAIN A VEHICLE
291 REGISTRATION CERTIFICATE IS A CRIMINAL OFFENSE UNDER FLORIDA
292 LAW. ANYONE GIVING FALSE INFORMATION ON THIS AFFIDAVIT IS
293 SUBJECT TO PROSECUTION.
294
295 If an application is made through a licensed motor vehicle
296 dealer as required under s. 319.23, the original or a photocopy
297 photostatic copy of such card, insurance policy, insurance
298 policy binder, or certificate of insurance or the original
299 affidavit from the insured must shall be forwarded by the dealer
300 to the tax collector of the county or the Department of Highway
Page 12 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
301 Safety and Motor Vehicles for processing. By executing the
302 aforesaid affidavit, a no licensed motor vehicle dealer is not
303 will be liable in damages for any inadequacy, insufficiency, or
304 falsification of any statement contained therein. A card must
305 also indicate the existence of any bodily injury liability
306 insurance voluntarily purchased.
307 (d) The verifying of proof of personal injury protection
308 insurance, proof of property damage liability insurance, proof
309 of combined bodily liability insurance and property damage
310 liability insurance, or proof of financial responsibility
311 insurance and the issuance or failure to issue the motor vehicle
312 registration under the provisions of this chapter may not be
313 construed in any court as a warranty of the reliability or
314 accuracy of the evidence of such proof or as meaning that the
315 provisions of any insurance policy furnished as proof of
316 financial responsibility comply with state law. Neither the
317 department nor any tax collector is liable in damages for any
318 inadequacy, insufficiency, falsification, or unauthorized
319 modification of any item of the proof of personal injury
320 protection insurance, proof of property damage liability
321 insurance, proof of combined bodily liability insurance and
322 property damage liability insurance, or proof of financial
323 responsibility before insurance prior to, during, or subsequent
324 to the verification of the proof. The issuance of a motor
325 vehicle registration does not constitute prima facie evidence or
Page 13 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
326 a presumption of insurance coverage.
327 Section 7. Paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of section
328 320.0609, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
329 320.0609 Transfer and exchange of registration license
330 plates; transfer fee.—
331 (1)
332 (b) The transfer of a license plate from a vehicle
333 disposed of to a newly acquired vehicle does not constitute a
334 new registration. The application for transfer must shall be
335 accepted without requiring proof of personal injury protection
336 or liability insurance.
337 Section 8. Subsection (3) of section 320.27, Florida
338 Statutes, is amended, and paragraph (g) is added to subsection
339 (1) of that section, to read:
340 320.27 Motor vehicle dealers.—
341 (1) DEFINITIONS.—The following words, terms, and phrases
342 when used in this section have the meanings respectively
343 ascribed to them in this subsection, except where the context
344 clearly indicates a different meaning:
345 (g) "Garage liability insurance" means, beginning January
346 1, 2027, combined single-limit liability coverage, including
347 property damage and bodily injury liability coverage, in the
348 amount of at least $60,000.
349 (3) APPLICATION AND FEE.—The application for the license
350 application must shall be in such form as may be prescribed by
Page 14 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
351 the department and is shall be subject to such rules with
352 respect thereto as may be so prescribed by the department it.
353 Such application must shall be verified by oath or affirmation
354 and must shall contain a full statement of the name and birth
355 date of the person or persons applying for the license therefor;
356 the name of the firm or copartnership, with the names and places
357 of residence of all members thereof, if such applicant is a firm
358 or copartnership; the names and places of residence of the
359 principal officers, if the applicant is a body corporate or
360 other artificial body; the name of the state under whose laws
361 the corporation is organized; the present and former place or
362 places of residence of the applicant; and the prior business in
363 which the applicant has been engaged and its the location
364 thereof. The Such application must shall describe the exact
365 location of the place of business and must shall state whether
366 the place of business is owned by the applicant and when
367 acquired, or, if leased, a true copy of the lease must shall be
368 attached to the application. The applicant shall certify that
369 the location provides an adequately equipped office and is not a
370 residence; that the location affords sufficient unoccupied space
371 upon and within which adequately to store all motor vehicles
372 offered and displayed for sale; and that the location is a
373 suitable place where the applicant can in good faith carry on
374 such business and keep and maintain books, records, and files
375 necessary to conduct such business, which must shall be
Page 15 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
376 available at all reasonable hours to inspection by the
377 department or any of its inspectors or other employees. The
378 applicant shall certify that the business of a motor vehicle
379 dealer is the principal business that will which shall be
380 conducted at that location. The application must shall contain a
381 statement that the applicant is either franchised by a
382 manufacturer of motor vehicles, in which case the name of each
383 motor vehicle that the applicant is franchised to sell must
384 shall be included, or an independent (nonfranchised) motor
385 vehicle dealer. The application must shall contain other
386 relevant information as may be required by the department. The
387 applicant shall furnish, including evidence, on a form approved
388 by the department, that the applicant is insured under a garage
389 liability insurance policy or a general liability insurance
390 policy coupled with a business automobile policy having the
391 coverages and limits of garage liability insurance coverage in
392 accordance with paragraph (1)(g), which shall include, at a
393 minimum, $25,000 combined single-limit liability coverage
394 including bodily injury and property damage protection and
395 $10,000 personal injury protection. However, a salvage motor
396 vehicle dealer as defined in subparagraph (1)(c)5. is exempt
397 from the requirements for garage liability insurance and
398 personal injury protection insurance on those vehicles that
399 cannot be legally operated on roads, highways, or streets in
400 this state. Franchise dealers must submit a garage liability
Page 16 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
401 insurance policy, and all other dealers must submit a garage
402 liability insurance policy or a general liability insurance
403 policy coupled with a business automobile policy. Such policy
404 must shall be for the license period, and evidence of a new or
405 continued policy must shall be delivered to the department at
406 the beginning of each license period. A licensee shall deliver
407 to the department, in the manner prescribed by the department,
408 within 10 calendar days after any renewal or continuation of or
409 change in such policy or within 10 calendar days after any
410 issuance of a new policy, a copy of the renewed, continued,
411 changed, or new policy. Upon making an initial application, the
412 applicant shall pay to the department a fee of $300 in addition
413 to any other fees required by law. Applicants may choose to
414 extend the licensure period for 1 additional year for a total of
415 2 years. An initial applicant shall pay to the department a fee
416 of $300 for the first year and $75 for the second year, in
417 addition to any other fees required by law. An applicant for
418 renewal shall pay to the department $75 for a 1-year renewal or
419 $150 for a 2-year renewal, in addition to any other fees
420 required by law. Upon making an application for a change of
421 location, the applicant person shall pay a fee of $50 in
422 addition to any other fees now required by law. The department
423 shall, in the case of every application for initial licensure,
424 verify whether certain facts set forth in the application are
425 true. Each applicant, general partner in the case of a
Page 17 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
426 partnership, or corporate officer and director in the case of a
427 corporate applicant shall, must file a set of fingerprints with
428 the department for the purpose of determining any prior criminal
429 record or any outstanding warrants. The department shall submit
430 the fingerprints to the Department of Law Enforcement for state
431 processing and forwarding to the Federal Bureau of Investigation
432 for federal processing. The actual cost of state and federal
433 processing must shall be borne by the applicant and is in
434 addition to the fee for licensure. The department may issue a
435 license to an applicant pending the results of the fingerprint
436 investigation, which license is fully revocable if the
437 department subsequently determines that any facts set forth in
438 the application are not true or correctly represented.
439 Section 9. Paragraph (j) of subsection (3) of section
440 320.771, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
441 320.771 License required of recreational vehicle dealers.—
442 (3) APPLICATION.—The application for such license shall be
443 in the form prescribed by the department and subject to such
444 rules as may be prescribed by it. The application shall be
445 verified by oath or affirmation and shall contain:
446 (j) Evidence that the applicant is insured under a garage
447 liability insurance policy as defined in s. 320.27(1)(g), which
448 shall include, at a minimum, $25,000 combined single-limit
449 liability coverage, including bodily injury and property damage
450 protection, and $10,000 personal injury protection, if the
Page 18 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
451 applicant is to be licensed as a dealer in, or intends to sell,
452 recreational vehicles. Such policy must be for the license
453 period. Within 10 calendar days after any renewal or
454 continuation of or material change in such policy or issuance of
455 a new policy, the licensee shall deliver to the department, in a
456 manner prescribed by the department, a copy of such renewed,
457 continued, changed, or new policy. However, a garage liability
458 policy is not required for the licensure of a mobile home dealer
459 who sells only park trailers.
460
461 The department shall, if it deems necessary, cause an
462 investigation to be made to ascertain if the facts set forth in
463 the application are true and shall not issue a license to the
464 applicant until it is satisfied that the facts set forth in the
465 application are true.
466 Section 10. Subsections (1) and (2) of section 322.251,
467 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
468 322.251 Notice of cancellation, suspension, revocation, or
469 disqualification of license.—
470 (1) All orders of cancellation, suspension, revocation, or
471 disqualification issued under the provisions of this chapter,
472 chapter 318, or chapter 324 must, or ss. 627.732-627.734 shall
473 be given either by personal delivery thereof to the licensee
474 whose license is being canceled, suspended, revoked, or
475 disqualified or by deposit in the United States mail in an
Page 19 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
476 envelope, first class, postage prepaid, addressed to the
477 licensee at his or her last known mailing address furnished to
478 the department. Such mailing by the department constitutes
479 notification, and any failure by the person to receive the
480 mailed order will not affect or stay the effective date or term
481 of the cancellation, suspension, revocation, or disqualification
482 of the licensee's driving privilege.
483 (2) The giving of notice and an order of cancellation,
484 suspension, revocation, or disqualification by mail is complete
485 upon expiration of 20 days after deposit in the United States
486 mail for all notices except those issued under chapter 324 or
487 ss. 627.732–627.734, which are complete 15 days after deposit in
488 the United States mail. Proof of the giving of notice and an
489 order of cancellation, suspension, revocation, or
490 disqualification in either manner must shall be made by entry in
491 the records of the department that such notice was given. The
492 entry is admissible in the courts of this state and constitutes
493 sufficient proof that such notice was given.
494 Section 11. Paragraph (a) of subsection (8) of section
495 322.34, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
496 322.34 Driving while license suspended, revoked, canceled,
497 or disqualified.—
498 (8)(a) Upon the arrest of a person for the offense of
499 driving while the person's driver license or driving privilege
500 is suspended or revoked, the arresting officer shall determine:
Page 20 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
501 1. Whether the person's driver license is suspended or
502 revoked, or the person is under suspension or revocation
503 equivalent status.
504 2. Whether the person's driver license has remained
505 suspended or revoked, or the person has been under suspension or
506 revocation equivalent status, since a conviction for the offense
507 of driving with a suspended or revoked license.
508 3. Whether the suspension, revocation, or suspension or
509 revocation equivalent status was made under s. 316.646 or s.
510 627.733, relating to failure to maintain required security, or
511 under s. 322.264, relating to habitual traffic offenders.
512 4. Whether the driver is the registered owner or co-owner
513 of the vehicle.
514 Section 12. Section 324.011, Florida Statutes, is amended
515 to read:
516 324.011 Legislative intent; purpose of chapter.—
517 (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that this chapter:
518 (a) Ensure that the privilege of owning or operating a
519 motor vehicle in this state is exercised to recognize the
520 existing privilege to own or operate a motor vehicle on the
521 public streets and highways of this state when such vehicles are
522 used with due consideration for the safety of others and their
523 property., and to
524 (b) Promote safety. and
525 (c) Provide financial security requirements for such
Page 21 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
526 owners and or operators whose responsibility it is to recompense
527 others for injury to person or property caused by the operation
528 of a motor vehicle.
529 (2) The purpose of this chapter is to require every owner
530 or operator of a motor vehicle that is required to be registered
531 in this state to establish, maintain, Therefore, it is required
532 herein that the operator of a motor vehicle involved in a crash
533 or convicted of certain traffic offenses meeting the operative
534 provisions of s. 324.051(2) shall respond for such damages and
535 show proof of financial ability to respond for damages arising
536 out of the ownership, maintenance, or use of a motor vehicle in
537 future accidents as a requisite to owning or operating a motor
538 vehicle in this state his or her future exercise of such
539 privileges.
540 Section 13. Subsections (1) and (7) and paragraph (c) of
541 subsection (9) of section 324.021, Florida Statutes, are
542 amended, and subsection (12) is added to that section, to read:
543 324.021 Definitions; minimum insurance required.—The
544 following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall, for
545 the purpose of this chapter, have the meanings respectively
546 ascribed to them in this section, except in those instances
547 where the context clearly indicates a different meaning:
548 (1) MOTOR VEHICLE.—Every self-propelled vehicle that is
549 designed and required to be licensed for use upon a highway,
550 including trailers and semitrailers designed for use with such
Page 22 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
551 vehicles, except traction engines, road rollers, farm tractors,
552 power shovels, and well drillers, and every vehicle that is
553 propelled by electric power obtained from overhead wires but not
554 operated upon rails, but not including any personal delivery
555 device or mobile carrier as defined in s. 316.003, bicycle,
556 electric bicycle, or moped. However, the term "motor vehicle"
557 does not include a motor vehicle as defined in s. 627.732(3)
558 when the owner of such vehicle has complied with the
559 requirements of ss. 627.730-627.7405, inclusive, unless the
560 provisions of s. 324.051 apply; and, in such case, the
561 applicable proof of insurance provisions of s. 320.02 apply.
562 (7) PROOF OF FINANCIAL RESPONSIBILITY.—Beginning January
563 1, 2027, That proof of ability to respond in damages for
564 liability on account of crashes arising out of the ownership,
565 maintenance, or use of a motor vehicle:
566 (a) With respect to a motor vehicle other than a
567 commercial motor vehicle, nonpublic sector bus, or for-hire
568 passenger transportation vehicle, in the amounts specified in s.
569 324.022(1). in the amount of $10,000 because of bodily injury
570 to, or death of, one person in any one crash;
571 (b) Subject to such limits for one person, in the amount
572 of $20,000 because of bodily injury to, or death of, two or more
573 persons in any one crash;
574 (c) In the amount of $10,000 because of injury to, or
575 destruction of, property of others in any one crash; and
Page 23 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
576 (b)(d) With respect to commercial motor vehicles and
577 nonpublic sector buses, in the amounts specified in s. 627.7415
578 ss. 627.7415 and 627.742, respectively.
579 (c) With respect to nonpublic sector buses, in the amounts
580 specified in s. 627.742.
581 (d) With respect to for-hire passenger transportation
582 vehicles, in the amounts specified in s. 324.032.
583 (9) OWNER; OWNER/LESSOR; APPLICATION.—
584 (c) Application.—
585 1. The limits on liability in subparagraphs (b)2. and 3.
586 do not apply to an owner of motor vehicles that are used for
587 commercial activity in the owner's ordinary course of business,
588 other than a rental company that rents or leases motor vehicles.
589 For purposes of this paragraph, the term "rental company"
590 includes only an entity that is engaged in the business of
591 renting or leasing motor vehicles to the general public and that
592 rents or leases a majority of its motor vehicles to persons with
593 no direct or indirect affiliation with the rental company. The
594 term "rental company" also includes:
595 a. A related rental or leasing company that is a
596 subsidiary of the same parent company as that of the renting or
597 leasing company that rented or leased the vehicle.
598 b. The holder of a motor vehicle title or an equity
599 interest in a motor vehicle title if the title or equity
600 interest is held pursuant to or to facilitate an asset-backed
Page 24 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
601 securitization of a fleet of motor vehicles used solely in the
602 business of renting or leasing motor vehicles to the general
603 public and under the dominion and control of a rental company,
604 as described in this subparagraph, in the operation of such
605 rental company's business.
606 2. Furthermore, with respect to commercial motor vehicles
607 as defined in s. 207.002 or s. 320.01(25) s. 627.732, the limits
608 on liability in subparagraphs (b)2. and 3. do not apply if, at
609 the time of the incident, the commercial motor vehicle is being
610 used in the transportation of materials found to be hazardous
611 for the purposes of the Hazardous Materials Transportation
612 Authorization Act of 1994, as amended, 49 U.S.C. ss. 5101 et
613 seq., and that is required pursuant to such act to carry
614 placards warning others of the hazardous cargo, unless at the
615 time of lease or rental either:
616 a. The lessee indicates in writing that the vehicle will
617 not be used to transport materials found to be hazardous for the
618 purposes of the Hazardous Materials Transportation Authorization
619 Act of 1994, as amended, 49 U.S.C. ss. 5101 et seq.; or
620 b. The lessee or other operator of the commercial motor
621 vehicle has in effect insurance with limits of at least $5
622 million $5,000,000 combined property damage and bodily injury
623 liability.
624 3.a. A motor vehicle dealer, or a motor vehicle dealer's
625 leasing or rental affiliate, that provides a temporary
Page 25 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
626 replacement vehicle at no charge or at a reasonable daily charge
627 to a service customer whose vehicle is being held for repair,
628 service, or adjustment by the motor vehicle dealer is immune
629 from any cause of action and is not liable, vicariously or
630 directly, under general law solely by reason of being the owner
631 of the temporary replacement vehicle for harm to persons or
632 property that arises out of the use, or operation, of the
633 temporary replacement vehicle by any person during the period
634 the temporary replacement vehicle has been entrusted to the
635 motor vehicle dealer's service customer if there is no
636 negligence or criminal wrongdoing on the part of the motor
637 vehicle owner, or its leasing or rental affiliate.
638 b. For purposes of this section, and notwithstanding any
639 other provision of general law, a motor vehicle dealer, or a
640 motor vehicle dealer's leasing or rental affiliate, that gives
641 possession, control, or use of a temporary replacement vehicle
642 to a motor vehicle dealer's service customer may not be adjudged
643 liable in a civil proceeding absent negligence or criminal
644 wrongdoing on the part of the motor vehicle dealer, or the motor
645 vehicle dealer's leasing or rental affiliate, if the motor
646 vehicle dealer or the motor vehicle dealer's leasing or rental
647 affiliate executes a written rental or use agreement and obtains
648 from the person receiving the temporary replacement vehicle a
649 copy of the person's driver license and insurance information
650 reflecting at least the minimum motor vehicle insurance coverage
Page 26 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
651 required in the state. Any subsequent determination that the
652 driver license or insurance information provided to the motor
653 vehicle dealer, or the motor vehicle dealer's leasing or rental
654 affiliate, was in any way false, fraudulent, misleading,
655 nonexistent, canceled, not in effect, or invalid does not alter
656 or diminish the protections provided by this section, unless the
657 motor vehicle dealer, or the motor vehicle dealer's leasing or
658 rental affiliate, had actual knowledge thereof at the time
659 possession of the temporary replacement vehicle was provided.
660 c. For purposes of this subparagraph, the term:
661 (I) "Control" means the power to direct the management and
662 policies of a person, whether through ownership of voting
663 securities or otherwise.
664 (II) "Motor vehicle dealer's leasing or rental affiliate"
665 means a person who directly or indirectly controls, is
666 controlled by, or is under common control with the motor vehicle
667 dealer.
668 d. For purposes of this subparagraph, the term "service
669 customer" does not include an agent or a principal of a motor
670 vehicle dealer or a motor vehicle dealer's leasing or rental
671 affiliate, and does not include an employee of a motor vehicle
672 dealer or a motor vehicle dealer's leasing or rental affiliate
673 unless the employee was provided a temporary replacement
674 vehicle:
675 (I) While the employee's personal vehicle was being held
Page 27 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
676 for repair, service, or adjustment by the motor vehicle dealer;
677 (II) In the same manner as other customers who are
678 provided a temporary replacement vehicle while the customer's
679 vehicle is being held for repair, service, or adjustment; and
680 (III) The employee was not acting within the course and
681 scope of his or her employment.
682 (12) FOR-HIRE PASSENGER TRANSPORTATION VEHICLE.—Every for-
683 hire vehicle as defined in s. 320.01(15) which is offered or
684 used to provide transportation for persons, including taxicabs,
685 limousines, and jitneys.
686 Section 14. Section 324.022, Florida Statutes, is amended
687 to read:
688 324.022 Financial responsibility requirements for property
689 damage.—
690 (1)(a) Beginning January 1, 2027, every owner or operator
691 of a motor vehicle required to be registered in this state shall
692 establish and continuously maintain the ability to respond in
693 damages for liability on account of accidents arising out of the
694 ownership, maintenance, or use of the motor vehicle in the
695 amount of:
696 1. Twenty-five thousand dollars for bodily injury to, or
697 the death of, one person in any one crash and, subject to such
698 limits for one person, in the amount of $50,000 for bodily
699 injury to, or the death of, two or more persons in any one
700 crash; and
Page 28 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
701 2. Ten thousand dollars for $10,000 because of damage to,
702 or destruction of, property of others in any one crash.
703 (b) The requirements of paragraph (a) this section may be
704 met by one of the methods established in s. 324.031; by self-
705 insuring as authorized by s. 768.28(16); or by maintaining a
706 motor vehicle liability policy that an insurance policy
707 providing coverage for property damage liability in the amount
708 of at least $10,000 because of damage to, or destruction of,
709 property of others in any one accident arising out of the use of
710 the motor vehicle. The requirements of this section may also be
711 met by having a policy which provides combined property damage
712 liability and bodily injury liability coverage for any one crash
713 arising out of the ownership, maintenance, or use of a motor
714 vehicle and that conforms to the requirements of s. 324.151 in
715 the amount of at least $60,000 for every owner or operator
716 subject to the financial responsibility required in paragraph
717 (a) $30,000 for combined property damage liability and bodily
718 injury liability for any one crash arising out of the use of the
719 motor vehicle. The policy, with respect to coverage for property
720 damage liability, must meet the applicable requirements of s.
721 324.151, subject to the usual policy exclusions that have been
722 approved in policy forms by the Office of Insurance Regulation.
723 No insurer shall have any duty to defend uncovered claims
724 irrespective of their joinder with covered claims.
725 (2) As used in this section, the term:
Page 29 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
726 (a) "Motor vehicle" means any self-propelled vehicle that
727 has four or more wheels and that is of a type designed and
728 required to be licensed for use on the highways of this state,
729 and any trailer or semitrailer designed for use with such
730 vehicle. The term does not include the following:
731 1. A mobile home as defined in s. 320.01(2)(a).
732 2. A motor vehicle that is used in mass transit and
733 designed to transport more than five passengers, exclusive of
734 the operator of the motor vehicle, and that is owned by a
735 municipality, transit authority, or political subdivision of the
736 state.
737 3. A school bus as defined in s. 1006.25, which must
738 maintain security as required under s. 316.615.
739 4. A commercial motor vehicle as defined in s. 207.002 or
740 s. 320.01(25), which must maintain security as required under
741 ss. 324.031 and 627.7415.
742 5. A nonpublic sector bus, which must maintain security as
743 required under ss. 324.031 and 627.742.
744 6.4. A vehicle providing for-hire passenger transportation
745 vehicle, which must that is subject to the provisions of s.
746 324.031. A taxicab shall maintain security as required under s.
747 324.032 s. 324.032(1).
748 7.5. A personal delivery device as defined in s. 316.003,
749 which must maintain security as required under s. 316.2071(4).
750 (b) "Owner" means the person who holds legal title to a
Page 30 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
751 motor vehicle or the debtor or lessee who has the right to
752 possession of a motor vehicle that is the subject of a security
753 agreement or lease with an option to purchase.
754 (3) Each nonresident owner or registrant of a motor
755 vehicle that, whether operated or not, has been physically
756 present within this state for more than 90 days during the
757 preceding 365 days shall maintain security as required by
758 subsection (1). The security must be that is in effect
759 continuously throughout the period the motor vehicle remains
760 within this state.
761 (4) An The owner or registrant of a motor vehicle who is
762 exempt from the requirements of this section if she or he is a
763 member of the United States Armed Forces and is called to or on
764 active duty outside the United States in an emergency situation
765 is exempt from this section while he or she. The exemption
766 provided by this subsection applies only as long as the member
767 of the Armed Forces is on such active duty. This exemption
768 outside the United States and applies only while the vehicle
769 covered by the security is not operated by any person. Upon
770 receipt of a written request by the insured to whom the
771 exemption provided in this subsection applies, the insurer shall
772 cancel the coverages and return any unearned premium or suspend
773 the security required by this section. Notwithstanding s.
774 324.0221(2) s. 324.0221(3), the department may not suspend the
775 registration or operator's license of an any owner or registrant
Page 31 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
776 of a motor vehicle during the time she or he qualifies for the
777 an exemption under this subsection. An Any owner or registrant
778 of a motor vehicle who qualifies for the an exemption under this
779 subsection shall immediately notify the department before prior
780 to and at the end of the expiration of the exemption.
781 Section 15. Subsections (1) and (2) of section 324.0221,
782 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
783 324.0221 Reports by insurers to the department; suspension
784 of driver license and vehicle registrations; reinstatement.—
785 (1)(a) Each insurer that has issued a policy providing
786 personal injury protection coverage or property damage liability
787 coverage shall report the cancellation or nonrenewal thereof to
788 the department within 10 days after the processing date or
789 effective date of each cancellation or nonrenewal. Upon the
790 issuance of a policy providing personal injury protection
791 coverage or property damage liability coverage to a named
792 insured not previously insured by the insurer during that
793 calendar year, the insurer shall report the issuance of the new
794 policy to the department within 10 days. The report must shall
795 be in the form and format and contain any information required
796 by the department and must be provided in a format that is
797 compatible with the data processing capabilities of the
798 department. Failure by an insurer to file proper reports with
799 the department as required by this subsection constitutes a
800 violation of the Florida Insurance Code. These records may shall
Page 32 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
801 be used by the department only for enforcement and regulatory
802 purposes, including the generation by the department of data
803 regarding compliance by owners of motor vehicles with the
804 requirements for financial responsibility coverage.
805 (b) With respect to an insurance policy providing personal
806 injury protection coverage or property damage liability
807 coverage, each insurer shall notify the named insured, or the
808 first-named insured in the case of a commercial fleet policy, in
809 writing that any cancellation or nonrenewal of the policy will
810 be reported by the insurer to the department. The notice must
811 also inform the named insured that failure to maintain bodily
812 injury liability personal injury protection coverage and
813 property damage liability coverage on a motor vehicle when
814 required by law may result in the loss of registration and
815 driving privileges in this state and inform the named insured of
816 the amount of the reinstatement fees required by this section.
817 This notice is for informational purposes only, and an insurer
818 is not civilly liable for failing to provide this notice.
819 (2) The department shall suspend, after due notice and an
820 opportunity to be heard, the registration and driver license of
821 any owner or registrant of a motor vehicle for with respect to
822 which security is required under s. 324.022, s. 324.023, s.
823 324.032, s. 627.7415, or s. 627.742 ss. 324.022 and 627.733
824 upon:
825 (a) The department's records showing that the owner or
Page 33 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
826 registrant of such motor vehicle does did not have the in full
827 force and effect when required security in full force and effect
828 that complies with the requirements of ss. 324.022 and 627.733;
829 or
830 (b) Notification by the insurer to the department, in a
831 form approved by the department, of cancellation or termination
832 of the required security.
833 Section 16. Section 324.0222, Florida Statutes, is created
834 to read:
835 324.0222 Application of driver license and registration
836 suspensions for failure to maintain security; reinstatement.—All
837 suspensions of driver licenses or motor vehicle registrations
838 for failure to maintain security as required by law in effect
839 before January 1, 2027, remain in full force and effect after
840 January 1, 2027. A driver may affect reinstatement of a
841 suspended driver license or registration as provided under s.
842 324.0221.
843 Section 17. Section 324.023, Florida Statutes, is amended
844 to read:
845 324.023 Financial responsibility for bodily injury or
846 death.—In addition to any other financial responsibility
847 required by law, every owner or operator of a motor vehicle that
848 is required to be registered in this state, or that is located
849 within this state, and who, regardless of adjudication of guilt,
850 has been found guilty of or entered a plea of guilty or nolo
Page 34 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
851 contendere to a charge of driving under the influence under s.
852 316.193 after October 1, 2007, shall, by one of the methods
853 established in s. 324.031(1)(a) or (b) s. 324.031(1) or (2),
854 establish and maintain the ability to respond in damages for
855 liability on account of accidents arising out of the ownership,
856 maintenance, or use of a motor vehicle in the amount of $100,000
857 because of bodily injury to, or death of, one person in any one
858 crash and, subject to such limits for one person, in the amount
859 of $300,000 because of bodily injury to, or death of, two or
860 more persons in any one crash and in the amount of $50,000
861 because of property damage in any one crash. If the owner or
862 operator chooses to establish and maintain such ability by
863 furnishing a certificate of deposit pursuant to s. 324.031(1)(b)
864 s. 324.031(2), such certificate of deposit must be at least
865 $350,000. Such higher limits must be carried for a minimum
866 period of 3 years. If the owner or operator has not been
867 convicted of driving under the influence or a felony traffic
868 offense for a period of 3 years from the date of reinstatement
869 of driving privileges for a violation of s. 316.193, the owner
870 or operator is shall be exempt from this section.
871 Section 18. Section 324.031, Florida Statutes, is amended
872 to read:
873 324.031 Manner of proving financial responsibility.—
874 (1) The owner or operator of a taxicab, limousine, jitney,
875 or any other for-hire passenger transportation vehicle may prove
Page 35 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
876 financial responsibility by providing satisfactory evidence of
877 holding a motor vehicle liability policy as defined in s.
878 324.021(8) or s. 324.151, which policy is issued by an insurance
879 carrier which is a member of the Florida Insurance Guaranty
880 Association. The owner or operator of a motor vehicle other than
881 a for-hire passenger transportation operator or owner of any
882 other vehicle may prove his or her financial responsibility by:
883 (a)(1) Furnishing satisfactory evidence of holding a motor
884 vehicle liability policy as defined in ss. 324.021(8) and
885 324.151 which provides liability coverage for the motor vehicle
886 being operated;
887 (b)(2) Furnishing a certificate of self-insurance showing
888 a deposit of cash in accordance with s. 324.161; or
889 (c)(3) Furnishing a certificate of self-insurance issued
890 by the department in accordance with s. 324.171.
891 (2) Beginning January 1, 2027, any person, including any
892 firm, partnership, association, corporation, or other person,
893 other than a natural person, electing to use the method of proof
894 specified in paragraph (1)(b) subsection (2) shall do both of
895 the following:
896 (a) Furnish a certificate of deposit equal to the number
897 of vehicles owned times $60,000 $30,000, up to a maximum of
898 $240,000. $120,000;
899 (b) In addition, any such person, other than a natural
900 person, shall Maintain insurance providing coverage that meets
Page 36 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
901 the requirements of s. 324.151 and has in excess of limits of:
902 1. At least $125,000 for bodily injury to, or the death
903 of, one person in any one crash; subject to such limits for one
904 person, at least $250,000 for bodily injury to, or the death of,
905 two or more persons in any one crash; and $50,000 of property
906 damage coverage for damage to, or destruction of, property of
907 others in any one crash; or
908 2. At least $300,000 for combined bodily injury liability
909 and property damage liability for any one crash
910 $10,000/20,000/10,000 or $30,000 combined single limits, and
911 such excess insurance shall provide minimum limits of
912 $125,000/250,000/50,000 or $300,000 combined single limits.
913 These increased limits shall not affect the requirements for
914 proving financial responsibility under s. 324.032(1).
915 Section 19. Section 324.032, Florida Statutes, is amended
916 to read:
917 324.032 Manner of proving Financial responsibility for;
918 for-hire passenger transportation vehicles.—Notwithstanding the
919 provisions of s. 324.031:
920 (1) An owner or a lessee of a for-hire passenger
921 transportation vehicle that is required to be registered in this
922 state shall establish and continuously maintain the ability to
923 respond in damages for liability on account of accidents arising
924 out of the ownership, maintenance, or use of the for-hire
925 passenger transportation vehicle, in the amount of:
Page 37 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
926 (a) One hundred twenty-five thousand dollars for bodily
927 injury to, or the death of, one person in any one crash and,
928 subject to such limits for one person, in the amount of $250,000
929 for bodily injury to, or the death of, two or more persons in
930 any one crash; and A person who is either the owner or a lessee
931 required to maintain insurance under s. 627.733(1)(b) and who
932 operates one or more taxicabs, limousines, jitneys, or any other
933 for-hire passenger transportation vehicles may prove financial
934 responsibility by furnishing satisfactory evidence of holding a
935 motor vehicle liability policy, but with minimum limits of
936 $125,000/250,000/50,000.
937 (b) Fifty thousand dollars for damage to, or destruction
938 of, property of others in any one crash A person who is either
939 the owner or a lessee required to maintain insurance under s.
940 324.021(9)(b) and who operates limousines, jitneys, or any other
941 for-hire passenger vehicles, other than taxicabs, may prove
942 financial responsibility by furnishing satisfactory evidence of
943 holding a motor vehicle liability policy as defined in s.
944 324.031.
945 (2) Except as provided in subsection (3), the requirements
946 of this section must be met by the owner or lessee providing
947 satisfactory evidence of holding a motor vehicle liability
948 policy conforming to the requirements of s. 324.151 which is
949 issued by an insurance carrier that is a member of the Florida
950 Insurance Guaranty Association.
Page 38 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
951 (3) An owner or a lessee who is required to maintain
952 insurance under s. 324.021(9)(b) and who operates at least 300
953 taxicabs, limousines, jitneys, or any other for-hire passenger
954 transportation vehicles may provide financial responsibility by
955 complying with the provisions of s. 324.171, which must such
956 compliance to be demonstrated by maintaining at its principal
957 place of business an audited financial statement, prepared in
958 accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and
959 providing to the department a certification issued by a
960 certified public accountant that the applicant's net worth is at
961 least equal to the requirements of s. 324.171 as determined by
962 the Office of Insurance Regulation of the Financial Services
963 Commission, including claims liabilities in an amount certified
964 as adequate by a Fellow of the Casualty Actuarial Society.
965
966 Upon request by the department, the applicant shall must provide
967 the department at the applicant's principal place of business in
968 this state access to the applicant's underlying financial
969 information and financial statements that provide the basis of
970 the certified public accountant's certification. The applicant
971 shall reimburse the requesting department for all reasonable
972 costs incurred by it in reviewing the supporting information.
973 The maximum amount of self-insurance permissible under this
974 subsection is $300,000 and must be stated on a per-occurrence
975 basis, and the applicant shall maintain adequate excess
Page 39 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
976 insurance issued by an authorized or eligible insurer licensed
977 or approved by the Office of Insurance Regulation. All risks
978 self-insured shall remain with the owner or lessee providing it,
979 and the risks are not transferable to any other person, unless a
980 policy complying with subsections (1) and (2) subsection (1) is
981 obtained.
982 Section 20. Subsection (2) of section 324.051, Florida
983 Statutes, is amended, and subsection (4) is added to that
984 section, to read:
985 324.051 Reports of crashes; suspensions of licenses and
986 registrations.—
987 (2)(a) Thirty days after receipt of notice of any accident
988 described in paragraph (1)(a) involving a motor vehicle within
989 this state, the department shall suspend, after due notice and
990 opportunity to be heard, the license of each operator and all
991 registrations of the owner of the vehicles operated by such
992 operator whether or not involved in such crash and, in the case
993 of a nonresident owner or operator, shall suspend such
994 nonresident's operating privilege in this state, unless such
995 operator or owner shall, prior to the expiration of such 30
996 days, be found by the department to be exempt from the operation
997 of this chapter, based upon evidence satisfactory to the
998 department that:
999 1. The motor vehicle was legally parked at the time of
1000 such crash.
Page 40 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
1001 2. The motor vehicle was owned by the United States
1002 Government, this state, or any political subdivision of this
1003 state or any municipality therein.
1004 3. Such operator or owner has secured a duly acknowledged
1005 written agreement providing for release from liability by all
1006 parties injured as the result of said crash and has complied
1007 with one of the provisions of s. 324.031.
1008 4. Such operator or owner has deposited with the
1009 department security to conform with s. 324.061 when applicable
1010 and has complied with one of the provisions of s. 324.031.
1011 5. One year has elapsed since such owner or operator was
1012 suspended pursuant to subsection (3), the owner or operator has
1013 complied with one of the provisions of s. 324.031, and no bill
1014 of complaint of which the department has notice has been filed
1015 in a court of competent jurisdiction.
1016 (b) This subsection does shall not apply:
1017 1. To such operator or owner if such operator or owner had
1018 in effect at the time of such crash or traffic conviction a
1019 motor vehicle an automobile liability policy with respect to all
1020 of the registered motor vehicles owned by such operator or
1021 owner.
1022 2. To such operator, if not the owner of such motor
1023 vehicle, if there was in effect at the time of such crash or
1024 traffic conviction a motor vehicle an automobile liability
1025 policy or bond with respect to his or her operation of motor
Page 41 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
1026 vehicles not owned by him or her.
1027 3. To such operator or owner if the liability of such
1028 operator or owner for damages resulting from such crash is, in
1029 the judgment of the department, covered by any other form of
1030 liability insurance or bond.
1031 4. To any person who has obtained from the department a
1032 certificate of self-insurance, in accordance with s. 324.171, or
1033 to any person operating a motor vehicle for such self-insurer.
1034
1035 A No such policy or bond is not shall be effective under this
1036 subsection unless it contains limits of not less than those
1037 specified in s. 324.021(7).
1038 (4) As used in this section, the term "motor vehicle"
1039 includes a motorcycle as defined in s. 320.01(26).
1040 Section 21. Section 324.071, Florida Statutes, is amended
1041 to read:
1042 324.071 Reinstatement; renewal of license; reinstatement
1043 fee.—An Any operator or owner whose license or registration has
1044 been suspended pursuant to s. 324.051(2), s. 324.072, s.
1045 324.081, or s. 324.121 may effect its reinstatement upon
1046 compliance with the provisions of s. 324.051(2)(a)3. or 4., or
1047 s. 324.081(2) and (3), as the case may be, and with one of the
1048 provisions of s. 324.031 and upon payment to the department of a
1049 nonrefundable reinstatement fee of $15. Only one such fee may
1050 shall be paid by any one person regardless irrespective of the
Page 42 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
1051 number of licenses and registrations to be then reinstated or
1052 issued to such person. All Such fees must shall be deposited in
1053 to a department trust fund. If When the reinstatement of any
1054 license or registration is effected by compliance with s.
1055 324.051(2)(a)3. or 4., the department may shall not renew the
1056 license or registration within a period of 3 years after from
1057 such reinstatement, and no nor shall any other license or
1058 registration may be issued in the name of such person, unless
1059 the operator continues is continuing to comply with one of the
1060 provisions of s. 324.031.
1061 Section 22. Subsection (1) of section 324.091, Florida
1062 Statutes, is amended to read:
1063 324.091 Notice to department; notice to insurer.—
1064 (1) Each owner and operator involved in a crash or
1065 conviction case within the purview of this chapter shall furnish
1066 evidence of automobile liability insurance or motor vehicle
1067 liability insurance within 14 days after the date of the mailing
1068 of notice of crash by the department in the form and manner as
1069 it may designate. Upon receipt of evidence that a an automobile
1070 liability policy or motor vehicle liability policy was in effect
1071 at the time of the crash or conviction case, the department
1072 shall forward to the insurer such information for verification
1073 in a method as determined by the department. The insurer shall
1074 respond to the department within 20 days after the notice as to
1075 whether or not such information is valid. If the department
Page 43 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
1076 determines that a an automobile liability policy or motor
1077 vehicle liability policy was not in effect and did not provide
1078 coverage for both the owner and the operator, it must shall take
1079 action as it is authorized to do under this chapter.
1080 Section 23. Section 324.151, Florida Statutes, is amended
1081 to read:
1082 324.151 Motor vehicle liability policies; required
1083 provisions.—
1084 (1) A motor vehicle liability policy that serves as to be
1085 proof of financial responsibility under s. 324.031(1)(a) must s.
1086 324.031(1) shall be issued to owners or operators of motor
1087 vehicles under the following provisions:
1088 (a) A motor vehicle An owner's liability insurance policy
1089 issued to an owner of a motor vehicle required to be registered
1090 in this state must designate by explicit description or by
1091 appropriate reference all motor vehicles for with respect to
1092 which coverage is thereby granted. The policy, must insure the
1093 person or persons owner named therein, and, unless except for a
1094 named driver excluded under s. 627.747, must insure any resident
1095 relative of a named insured other person as operator using such
1096 motor vehicle or motor vehicles with the express or implied
1097 permission of such owner against loss from the liability imposed
1098 by law for damage arising out of the ownership, maintenance, or
1099 use of any such motor vehicle or motor vehicles within the
1100 United States or the Dominion of Canada, subject to limits,
Page 44 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
1101 exclusive of interest and costs with respect to each such motor
1102 vehicle as is provided for under s. 324.021(7). The policy must
1103 also insure any person operating an insured motor vehicle with
1104 the express or implied permission of a named insured against
1105 loss from the liability imposed by law for damage arising out of
1106 the ownership, maintenance, or use of any motor vehicle, unless
1107 that person was excluded under s. 627.747. However, the insurer
1108 may include provisions in its policy excluding liability
1109 coverage for a motor vehicle not designated as an insured
1110 vehicle on the policy if such motor vehicle does not qualify as
1111 a newly acquired vehicle or as a temporary substitute vehicle
1112 and was owned by the insured or was furnished for an insured's
1113 regular use for more than 30 consecutive days before the event
1114 giving rise to the claim. Insurers may make available, with
1115 respect to property damage liability coverage, a deductible
1116 amount not to exceed $500. In the event of a property damage
1117 loss covered by a policy containing a property damage deductible
1118 provision, the insurer shall pay to the third-party claimant the
1119 amount of any property damage liability settlement or judgment,
1120 subject to policy limits, as if no deductible existed.
1121 (b) A motor vehicle liability policy issued to a person
1122 who does not own a An operator's motor vehicle must liability
1123 policy of insurance shall insure the person or persons named
1124 therein against loss from the liability imposed upon him or her
1125 by law for damages arising out of the ownership, maintenance, or
Page 45 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
1126 use by the person of any motor vehicle not owned by him or her,
1127 with the same territorial limits and subject to the same limits
1128 of liability as referred to above with respect to an owner's
1129 policy of liability insurance.
1130 (c) All such motor vehicle liability policies must provide
1131 liability coverage with limits, exclusive of interest and costs,
1132 greater than or equal to the limits specified under s.
1133 324.021(7) for accidents occurring within the United States and
1134 Canada. The policies must shall state the name and address of
1135 the named insured, the coverage afforded by the policy, the
1136 premium charged therefor, the policy period, and the limits of
1137 liability, and must shall contain an agreement or be endorsed
1138 that insurance is provided in accordance with the coverage
1139 defined in this chapter as respects bodily injury and death or
1140 property damage or both and is subject to all provisions of this
1141 chapter. The Said policies must shall also contain a provision
1142 that the satisfaction by an insured of a judgment for such
1143 injury or damage may shall not be a condition precedent to the
1144 right or duty of the insurance carrier to make payment on
1145 account of such injury or damage, and must shall also contain a
1146 provision that bankruptcy or insolvency of the insured or of the
1147 insured's estate does shall not relieve the insurance carrier of
1148 any of its obligations under the said policy.
1149 (2) The provisions of This section is shall not be
1150 applicable to any motor vehicle automobile liability policy
Page 46 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
1151 unless and until it is furnished as proof of financial
1152 responsibility for the future pursuant to s. 324.031, and then
1153 applies only from and after the date the said policy is so
1154 furnished and thereafter.
1155 (3) As used in this section, the term:
1156 (a) "Newly acquired vehicle" means a vehicle owned by a
1157 named insured or a resident relative of the named insured which
1158 was acquired no more than 30 days before an accident.
1159 (b) "Resident relative" means a person related to a named
1160 insured by any degree by blood, marriage, or adoption, including
1161 a ward or foster child, who makes his or her home in the same
1162 family unit or residence as the named insured, regardless of
1163 whether he or she temporarily lives elsewhere.
1164 (c) "Temporary substitute vehicle" means any motor vehicle
1165 that is not owned by the named insured and that is temporarily
1166 used with the permission of the owner as a substitute for the
1167 owned motor vehicle designated on the policy when the owned
1168 vehicle is withdrawn from normal use because of breakdown,
1169 repair, servicing, loss, or destruction.
1170 Section 24. Section 324.161, Florida Statutes, is amended
1171 to read:
1172 324.161 Proof of financial responsibility; deposit.—If a
1173 person elects to prove his or her financial responsibility under
1174 the method of proof specified in s. 324.031(1)(b), he or she
1175 annually must obtain and submit to the department proof of a
Page 47 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
1176 certificate of deposit in the amount required under s.
1177 324.031(2) from a financial institution insured by the Federal
1178 Deposit Insurance Corporation or the National Credit Union
1179 Administration Annually, before any certificate of insurance may
1180 be issued to a person, including any firm, partnership,
1181 association, corporation, or other person, other than a natural
1182 person, proof of a certificate of deposit of $30,000 issued and
1183 held by a financial institution must be submitted to the
1184 department. A power of attorney will be issued to and held by
1185 the department, and may be executed upon a judgment issued
1186 against such person making the deposit, for damages for because
1187 of bodily injury to or death of any person or for damages for
1188 because of injury to or destruction of property resulting from
1189 the use or operation of any motor vehicle occurring after such
1190 deposit was made. Money so deposited is shall not be subject to
1191 attachment or execution unless such attachment or execution
1192 arises shall arise out of a lawsuit suit for such damages as
1193 aforesaid.
1194 Section 25. Subsections (1) and (2) of section 324.171,
1195 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
1196 324.171 Self-insurer.—
1197 (1) A Any person may qualify as a self-insurer by
1198 obtaining a certificate of self-insurance from the department.
1199 which may, in its discretion and Upon application of such a
1200 person, the department may issue a said certificate of self-
Page 48 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
1201 insurance to an applicant who satisfies when such person has
1202 satisfied the requirements of this section. Effective January 1,
1203 2027 to qualify as a self-insurer under this section:
1204 (a) A private individual with private passenger vehicles
1205 shall possess a net unencumbered worth of at least $100,000
1206 $40,000.
1207 (b) A person, including any firm, partnership,
1208 association, corporation, or other person, other than a natural
1209 person, shall:
1210 1. Possess a net unencumbered worth of at least $100,000
1211 $40,000 for the first motor vehicle and $50,000 $20,000 for each
1212 additional motor vehicle; or
1213 2. Maintain sufficient net worth, in an amount determined
1214 by the department, to be financially responsible for potential
1215 losses. The department, with the assistance of the Office of
1216 Insurance Regulation of the Financial Services Commission, shall
1217 annually determine the minimum net worth sufficient to satisfy
1218 this subparagraph as determined annually by the department,
1219 pursuant to rules adopted promulgated by the department, with
1220 the assistance of the Office of Insurance Regulation of the
1221 Financial Services Commission, to be financially responsible for
1222 potential losses. The rules must consider any shall take into
1223 consideration excess insurance carried by the applicant. The
1224 department's determination must shall be based upon reasonable
1225 actuarial principles considering the frequency, severity, and
Page 49 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
1226 loss development of claims incurred by casualty insurers writing
1227 coverage on the type of motor vehicles for which a certificate
1228 of self-insurance is desired.
1229 (c) The owner of a commercial motor vehicle, as defined in
1230 s. 207.002 or s. 320.01(25) s. 320.01, may qualify as a self-
1231 insurer subject to the standards provided for in subparagraph
1232 (b)2.
1233 (2) The self-insurance certificate must shall provide
1234 limits of liability insurance in the amounts specified under s.
1235 324.021(7) or s. 627.7415 and shall provide personal injury
1236 protection coverage under s. 627.733(3)(b).
1237 Section 26. Subsections (1) and (3) of section 324.242,
1238 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
1239 324.242 Personal injury protection and property damage
1240 liability insurance policies; public records exemption.—
1241 (1) The following information regarding personal injury
1242 protection and property damage liability insurance policies held
1243 by the department is confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1)
1244 and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution:
1245 (a) Personal identifying information of an insured or
1246 former insured; and
1247 (b) An insurance policy number.
1248 (3) The department shall provide personal injury
1249 protection and property damage liability insurance policy
1250 numbers to department-approved third parties that provide data
Page 50 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
1251 collection services to an insurer of any person involved in such
1252 accident.
1253 Section 27. Section 324.251, Florida Statutes, is amended
1254 to read:
1255 324.251 Short title.—This chapter may be cited as the
1256 "Financial Responsibility Law of 2026 1955" and is shall become
1257 effective at 12:01 a.m., January 1, 2027 October 1, 1955.
1258 Section 28. Subsection (4) of section 400.9905, Florida
1259 Statutes, is amended to read:
1260 400.9905 Definitions.—
1261 (4)(a) "Clinic" means an entity where health care services
1262 are provided to individuals and which tenders charges for
1263 reimbursement for such services, including a mobile clinic and a
1264 portable equipment provider. As used in this part, the term does
1265 not include and the licensure requirements of this part do not
1266 apply to:
1267 1.(a) Entities licensed or registered by the state under
1268 chapter 395; entities licensed or registered by the state and
1269 providing only health care services within the scope of services
1270 authorized under their respective licenses under ss. 383.30-
1271 383.332, chapter 390, chapter 394, chapter 397, this chapter
1272 except part X, chapter 429, chapter 463, chapter 465, chapter
1273 466, chapter 478, chapter 484, or chapter 651; end-stage renal
1274 disease providers authorized under 42 C.F.R. part 494; providers
1275 certified and providing only health care services within the
Page 51 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
1276 scope of services authorized under their respective
1277 certifications under 42 C.F.R. part 485, subpart B, subpart H,
1278 or subpart J; providers certified and providing only health care
1279 services within the scope of services authorized under their
1280 respective certifications under 42 C.F.R. part 486, subpart C;
1281 providers certified and providing only health care services
1282 within the scope of services authorized under their respective
1283 certifications under 42 C.F.R. part 491, subpart A; providers
1284 certified by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services
1285 under the federal Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments and
1286 the federal rules adopted thereunder; or any entity that
1287 provides neonatal or pediatric hospital-based health care
1288 services or other health care services by licensed practitioners
1289 solely within a hospital licensed under chapter 395.
1290 2.(b) Entities that own, directly or indirectly, entities
1291 licensed or registered by the state pursuant to chapter 395;
1292 entities that own, directly or indirectly, entities licensed or
1293 registered by the state and providing only health care services
1294 within the scope of services authorized pursuant to their
1295 respective licenses under ss. 383.30-383.332, chapter 390,
1296 chapter 394, chapter 397, this chapter except part X, chapter
1297 429, chapter 463, chapter 465, chapter 466, chapter 478, chapter
1298 484, or chapter 651; end-stage renal disease providers
1299 authorized under 42 C.F.R. part 494; providers certified and
1300 providing only health care services within the scope of services
Page 52 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
1301 authorized under their respective certifications under 42 C.F.R.
1302 part 485, subpart B, subpart H, or subpart J; providers
1303 certified and providing only health care services within the
1304 scope of services authorized under their respective
1305 certifications under 42 C.F.R. part 486, subpart C; providers
1306 certified and providing only health care services within the
1307 scope of services authorized under their respective
1308 certifications under 42 C.F.R. part 491, subpart A; providers
1309 certified by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services
1310 under the federal Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments and
1311 the federal rules adopted thereunder; or any entity that
1312 provides neonatal or pediatric hospital-based health care
1313 services by licensed practitioners solely within a hospital
1314 licensed under chapter 395.
1315 3.(c) Entities that are owned, directly or indirectly, by
1316 an entity licensed or registered by the state pursuant to
1317 chapter 395; entities that are owned, directly or indirectly, by
1318 an entity licensed or registered by the state and providing only
1319 health care services within the scope of services authorized
1320 pursuant to their respective licenses under ss. 383.30-383.332,
1321 chapter 390, chapter 394, chapter 397, this chapter except part
1322 X, chapter 429, chapter 463, chapter 465, chapter 466, chapter
1323 478, chapter 484, or chapter 651; end-stage renal disease
1324 providers authorized under 42 C.F.R. part 494; providers
1325 certified and providing only health care services within the
Page 53 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
1326 scope of services authorized under their respective
1327 certifications under 42 C.F.R. part 485, subpart B, subpart H,
1328 or subpart J; providers certified and providing only health care
1329 services within the scope of services authorized under their
1330 respective certifications under 42 C.F.R. part 486, subpart C;
1331 providers certified and providing only health care services
1332 within the scope of services authorized under their respective
1333 certifications under 42 C.F.R. part 491, subpart A; providers
1334 certified by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services
1335 under the federal Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments and
1336 the federal rules adopted thereunder; or any entity that
1337 provides neonatal or pediatric hospital-based health care
1338 services by licensed practitioners solely within a hospital
1339 under chapter 395.
1340 4.(d) Entities that are under common ownership, directly
1341 or indirectly, with an entity licensed or registered by the
1342 state pursuant to chapter 395; entities that are under common
1343 ownership, directly or indirectly, with an entity licensed or
1344 registered by the state and providing only health care services
1345 within the scope of services authorized pursuant to their
1346 respective licenses under ss. 383.30-383.332, chapter 390,
1347 chapter 394, chapter 397, this chapter except part X, chapter
1348 429, chapter 463, chapter 465, chapter 466, chapter 478, chapter
1349 484, or chapter 651; end-stage renal disease providers
1350 authorized under 42 C.F.R. part 494; providers certified and
Page 54 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
1351 providing only health care services within the scope of services
1352 authorized under their respective certifications under 42 C.F.R.
1353 part 485, subpart B, subpart H, or subpart J; providers
1354 certified and providing only health care services within the
1355 scope of services authorized under their respective
1356 certifications under 42 C.F.R. part 486, subpart C; providers
1357 certified and providing only health care services within the
1358 scope of services authorized under their respective
1359 certifications under 42 C.F.R. part 491, subpart A; providers
1360 certified by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services
1361 under the federal Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments and
1362 the federal rules adopted thereunder; or any entity that
1363 provides neonatal or pediatric hospital-based health care
1364 services by licensed practitioners solely within a hospital
1365 licensed under chapter 395.
1366 5.(e) An entity that is exempt from federal taxation under
1367 26 U.S.C. s. 501(c)(3) or (4), an employee stock ownership plan
1368 under 26 U.S.C. s. 409 that has a board of trustees at least
1369 two-thirds of which are Florida-licensed health care
1370 practitioners and provides only physical therapy services under
1371 physician orders, any community college or university clinic,
1372 and any entity owned or operated by the federal or state
1373 government, including agencies, subdivisions, or municipalities
1374 thereof.
1375 6.(f) A sole proprietorship, group practice, partnership,
Page 55 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
1376 or corporation that provides health care services by physicians
1377 covered by s. 627.419, that is directly supervised by one or
1378 more of such physicians, and that is wholly owned by one or more
1379 of those physicians or by a physician and the spouse, parent,
1380 child, or sibling of that physician.
1381 7.(g) A sole proprietorship, group practice, partnership,
1382 or corporation that provides health care services by licensed
1383 health care practitioners under chapter 457, chapter 458,
1384 chapter 459, chapter 460, chapter 461, chapter 462, chapter 463,
1385 chapter 466, chapter 467, chapter 480, chapter 484, chapter 486,
1386 chapter 490, chapter 491, or part I, part III, part X, part
1387 XIII, or part XIV of chapter 468, or s. 464.012, and that is
1388 wholly owned by one or more licensed health care practitioners,
1389 or the licensed health care practitioners set forth in this
1390 subparagraph paragraph and the spouse, parent, child, or sibling
1391 of a licensed health care practitioner if one of the owners who
1392 is a licensed health care practitioner is supervising the
1393 business activities and is legally responsible for the entity's
1394 compliance with all federal and state laws. However, a health
1395 care practitioner may not supervise services beyond the scope of
1396 the practitioner's license, except that, for the purposes of
1397 this part, a clinic owned by a licensee in s. 456.053(3)(b)
1398 which provides only services authorized pursuant to s.
1399 456.053(3)(b) may be supervised by a licensee specified in s.
1400 456.053(3)(b).
Page 56 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
1401 8.(h) Clinical facilities affiliated with an accredited
1402 medical school at which training is provided for medical
1403 students, residents, or fellows.
1404 9.(i) Entities that provide only oncology or radiation
1405 therapy services by physicians licensed under chapter 458 or
1406 chapter 459 or entities that provide oncology or radiation
1407 therapy services by physicians licensed under chapter 458 or
1408 chapter 459 which are owned by a corporation whose shares are
1409 publicly traded on a recognized stock exchange.
1410 10.(j) Clinical facilities affiliated with a college of
1411 chiropractic accredited by the Council on Chiropractic Education
1412 at which training is provided for chiropractic students.
1413 11.(k) Entities that provide licensed practitioners to
1414 staff emergency departments or to deliver anesthesia services in
1415 facilities licensed under chapter 395 and that derive at least
1416 90 percent of their gross annual revenues from the provision of
1417 such services. Entities claiming an exemption from licensure
1418 under this subparagraph paragraph must provide documentation
1419 demonstrating compliance.
1420 12.(l) Orthotic, prosthetic, pediatric cardiology, or
1421 perinatology clinical facilities or anesthesia clinical
1422 facilities that are not otherwise exempt under subparagraph 1.
1423 or subparagraph 11. paragraph (a) or paragraph (k) and that are
1424 a publicly traded corporation or are wholly owned, directly or
1425 indirectly, by a publicly traded corporation. As used in this
Page 57 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
1426 subparagraph paragraph, a publicly traded corporation is a
1427 corporation that issues securities traded on an exchange
1428 registered with the United States Securities and Exchange
1429 Commission as a national securities exchange.
1430 13.(m) Entities that are owned by a corporation that has
1431 $250 million or more in total annual sales of health care
1432 services provided by licensed health care practitioners where
1433 one or more of the persons responsible for the operations of the
1434 entity is a health care practitioner who is licensed in this
1435 state and who is responsible for supervising the business
1436 activities of the entity and is responsible for the entity's
1437 compliance with state law for purposes of this part.
1438 14.(n) Entities that employ 50 or more licensed health
1439 care practitioners licensed under chapter 458 or chapter 459
1440 where the billing for medical services is under a single tax
1441 identification number. The application for exemption under this
1442 subparagraph must include subsection shall contain information
1443 that includes: the name, residence, and business address and
1444 telephone phone number of the entity that owns the practice; a
1445 complete list of the names and contact information of all the
1446 officers and directors of the corporation; the name, residence
1447 address, business address, and medical license number of each
1448 licensed Florida health care practitioner employed by the
1449 entity; the corporate tax identification number of the entity
1450 seeking an exemption; a listing of health care services to be
Page 58 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
1451 provided by the entity at the health care clinics owned or
1452 operated by the entity; and a certified statement prepared by an
1453 independent certified public accountant which states that the
1454 entity and the health care clinics owned or operated by the
1455 entity have not received payment for health care services under
1456 medical payments personal injury protection insurance coverage
1457 for the preceding year. If the agency determines that an entity
1458 that which is exempt under this subparagraph subsection has
1459 received payments for medical services under medical payments
1460 personal injury protection insurance coverage, the agency may
1461 deny or revoke the exemption from licensure under this
1462 subparagraph subsection.
1463 15.(o) Entities that are, directly or indirectly, under
1464 the common ownership of or that are subject to common control by
1465 a mutual insurance holding company, as defined in s. 628.703,
1466 with an entity issued a certificate of authority under chapter
1467 624 or chapter 641 which has $1 billion or more in total annual
1468 sales in this state.
1469 16.(p) Entities that are owned by an entity that is a
1470 behavioral health care service provider in at least five other
1471 states; that, together with its affiliates, have $90 million or
1472 more in total annual revenues associated with the provision of
1473 behavioral health care services; and wherein one or more of the
1474 persons responsible for the operations of the entity is a health
1475 care practitioner who is licensed in this state, who is
Page 59 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
1476 responsible for supervising the business activities of the
1477 entity, and who is responsible for the entity's compliance with
1478 state law for purposes of this part.
1479 17.(q) Medicaid providers.
1480 (b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) this subsection, an
1481 entity is shall be deemed a clinic and must be licensed under
1482 this part in order to receive medical payments coverage
1483 reimbursement unless the entity is:
1484 1. Wholly owned by a physician licensed under chapter 458
1485 or chapter 459 or by the physician and the spouse, parent,
1486 child, or sibling of the physician;
1487 2. Wholly owned by a dentist licensed under chapter 466 or
1488 by the dentist and the spouse, parent, child, or sibling of the
1489 dentist;
1490 3. Wholly owned by a chiropractic physician licensed under
1491 chapter 460 or by the chiropractic physician and the spouse,
1492 parent, child, or sibling of the chiropractic physician;
1493 4. A hospital or an ambulatory surgical center licensed
1494 under chapter 395;
1495 5. An entity that wholly owns or is wholly owned, directly
1496 or indirectly, by a hospital licensed under chapter 395;
1497 6. A clinical facility affiliated with an accredited
1498 medical school at which training is provided for medical
1499 students, residents, or fellows;
1500 7. Certified under 42 C.F.R. part 485, subpart H; or
Page 60 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
1501 8. Owned by a publicly traded corporation, either directly
1502 or indirectly through its subsidiaries, which has $250 million
1503 or more in total annual sales of health care services provided
1504 by licensed health care practitioners, if one or more of the
1505 persons responsible for the operations of the entity are health
1506 care practitioners who are licensed in this state and who are
1507 responsible for supervising the business activities of the
1508 entity and the entity's compliance with state law for purposes
1509 of this subsection under the Florida Motor Vehicle No-Fault Law,
1510 ss. 627.730-627.7405, unless exempted under s. 627.736(5)(h).
1511 Section 29. Subsection (5) of section 400.991, Florida
1512 Statutes, is amended to read:
1513 400.991 License requirements; background screenings;
1514 prohibitions.—
1515 (5) All agency forms for licensure application or
1516 exemption from licensure under this part must contain the
1517 following statement:
1518
1519 INSURANCE FRAUD NOTICE.—A person commits a fraudulent
1520 insurance act, as defined in s. 626.989, Florida
1521 Statutes, if the person who knowingly submits a false,
1522 misleading, or fraudulent application or other
1523 document when applying for licensure as a health care
1524 clinic, seeking an exemption from licensure as a
1525 health care clinic, or demonstrating compliance with
Page 61 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
1526 part X of chapter 400, Florida Statutes, with the
1527 intent to use the license, exemption from licensure,
1528 or demonstration of compliance to provide services or
1529 seek reimbursement under a motor vehicle liability
1530 policy's medical payments coverage the Florida Motor
1531 Vehicle No-Fault Law, commits a fraudulent insurance
1532 act, as defined in s. 626.989, Florida Statutes. A
1533 person who presents a claim for benefits under medical
1534 payments coverage personal injury protection benefits
1535 knowing that the payee knowingly submitted such health
1536 care clinic application or document commits insurance
1537 fraud, as defined in s. 817.234, Florida Statutes.
1538 Section 30. Paragraph (g) of subsection (1) of section
1539 400.9935, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1540 400.9935 Clinic responsibilities.—
1541 (1) Each clinic shall appoint a medical director or clinic
1542 director who shall agree in writing to accept legal
1543 responsibility for the following activities on behalf of the
1544 clinic. The medical director or the clinic director shall:
1545 (g) Conduct systematic reviews of clinic billings to
1546 ensure that the billings are not fraudulent or unlawful. Upon
1547 discovery of an unlawful charge, the medical director or clinic
1548 director shall take immediate corrective action. If the clinic
1549 performs only the technical component of magnetic resonance
1550 imaging, static radiographs, computed tomography, or positron
Page 62 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
1551 emission tomography, and provides the professional
1552 interpretation of such services, in a fixed facility that is
1553 accredited by a national accrediting organization that is
1554 approved by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for
1555 magnetic resonance imaging and advanced diagnostic imaging
1556 services and if, in the preceding quarter, the percentage of
1557 scans performed by that clinic which was billed to motor vehicle
1558 all personal injury protection insurance carriers under medical
1559 payments coverage was less than 15 percent, the chief financial
1560 officer of the clinic may, in a written acknowledgment provided
1561 to the agency, assume the responsibility for the conduct of the
1562 systematic reviews of clinic billings to ensure that the
1563 billings are not fraudulent or unlawful.
1564 Section 31. Subsection (28) of section 409.901, Florida
1565 Statutes, is amended to read:
1566 409.901 Definitions; ss. 409.901-409.920.—As used in ss.
1567 409.901-409.920, except as otherwise specifically provided, the
1568 term:
1569 (28) "Third-party benefit" means any benefit that is or
1570 may be available at any time through contract, court award,
1571 judgment, settlement, agreement, or any arrangement between a
1572 third party and any person or entity, including, without
1573 limitation, a Medicaid recipient, a provider, another third
1574 party, an insurer, or the agency, for any Medicaid-covered
1575 injury, illness, goods, or services, including costs of medical
Page 63 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
1576 services related thereto, for bodily personal injury or for
1577 death of the recipient, but specifically excluding policies of
1578 life insurance policies on the recipient, unless available under
1579 terms of the policy to pay medical expenses before prior to
1580 death. The term includes, without limitation, collateral, as
1581 defined in this section;, health insurance;, any benefit under a
1582 health maintenance organization, a preferred provider
1583 arrangement, a prepaid health clinic, liability insurance,
1584 uninsured motorist insurance, or medical payments coverage; or
1585 personal injury protection coverage, medical benefits under
1586 workers' compensation;, and any obligation under law or equity
1587 to provide medical support.
1588 Section 32. Paragraph (f) of subsection (11) of section
1589 409.910, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1590 409.910 Responsibility for payments on behalf of Medicaid-
1591 eligible persons when other parties are liable.—
1592 (11) The agency may, as a matter of right, in order to
1593 enforce its rights under this section, institute, intervene in,
1594 or join any legal or administrative proceeding in its own name
1595 in one or more of the following capacities: individually, as
1596 subrogee of the recipient, as assignee of the recipient, or as
1597 lienholder of the collateral.
1598 (f) Notwithstanding any provision in this section to the
1599 contrary, in the event of an action in tort against a third
1600 party in which the recipient or his or her legal representative
Page 64 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
1601 is a party which results in a judgment, award, or settlement
1602 from a third party, the amount recovered shall be distributed as
1603 follows:
1604 1. After attorney attorney's fees and taxable costs as
1605 defined by the Florida Rules of Civil Procedure, one-half of the
1606 remaining recovery shall be paid to the agency up to the total
1607 amount of medical assistance provided by Medicaid.
1608 2. The remaining amount of the recovery shall be paid to
1609 the recipient.
1610 3. For purposes of calculating the agency's recovery of
1611 medical assistance benefits paid, the fee for services of an
1612 attorney retained by the recipient or his or her legal
1613 representative shall be calculated at 25 percent of the
1614 judgment, award, or settlement.
1615 4. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to
1616 the contrary, the agency is shall be entitled to all medical
1617 coverage benefits up to the total amount of medical assistance
1618 provided by Medicaid. For purposes of this paragraph, the term
1619 "medical coverage" means any benefits under health insurance, a
1620 health maintenance organization, a preferred provider
1621 arrangement, or a prepaid health clinic, and the portion of
1622 benefits designated for medical payments under coverage for
1623 workers' compensation coverage, motor vehicle insurance
1624 coverage, personal injury protection, and casualty coverage.
1625 Section 33. Paragraph (k) of subsection (2) of section
Page 65 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
1626 456.057, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1627 456.057 Ownership and control of patient records; report
1628 or copies of records to be furnished; disclosure of
1629 information.—
1630 (2) As used in this section, the terms "records owner,"
1631 "health care practitioner," and "health care practitioner's
1632 employer" do not include any of the following persons or
1633 entities; furthermore, the following persons or entities are not
1634 authorized to acquire or own medical records, but are authorized
1635 under the confidentiality and disclosure requirements of this
1636 section to maintain those documents required by the part or
1637 chapter under which they are licensed or regulated:
1638 (k) Persons or entities practicing under s. 627.736(7).
1639 Section 34. Paragraphs (ee) and (ff) of subsection (1) of
1640 section 456.072, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
1641 456.072 Grounds for discipline; penalties; enforcement.—
1642 (1) The following acts shall constitute grounds for which
1643 the disciplinary actions specified in subsection (2) may be
1644 taken:
1645 (ee) With respect to making a medical payments coverage
1646 personal injury protection claim as required by s. 627.736,
1647 intentionally submitting a claim, statement, or bill that has
1648 been upcoded. As used in this paragraph, the term "upcode" means
1649 to submit a billing code that would result in a greater payment
1650 amount than would be paid using a billing code that accurately
Page 66 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
1651 describes the services performed. The term does not include an
1652 otherwise lawful bill by a magnetic resonance imaging facility
1653 which globally combines both technical and professional
1654 components, if the amount of the global bill is not more than
1655 the components if billed separately; however, payment of such a
1656 bill constitutes payment in full for all components of such
1657 service "upcoded" as defined in s. 627.732.
1658 (ff) With respect to making a medical payments coverage
1659 personal injury protection claim as required by s. 627.736,
1660 intentionally submitting a claim, statement, or bill for payment
1661 of services that were not rendered.
1662 Section 35. Paragraphs (i) and (o) of subsection (1) of
1663 section 626.9541, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
1664 626.9541 Unfair methods of competition and unfair or
1665 deceptive acts or practices defined.—
1666 (1) UNFAIR METHODS OF COMPETITION AND UNFAIR OR DECEPTIVE
1667 ACTS.—The following are defined as unfair methods of competition
1668 and unfair or deceptive acts or practices:
1669 (i) Unfair claim settlement practices.—
1670 1. Attempting to settle claims on the basis of an
1671 application, when serving as a binder or intended to become a
1672 part of the policy, or any other material document which was
1673 altered without notice to, or knowledge or consent of, the
1674 insured;
1675 2. Making a material misrepresentation made to an insured
Page 67 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
1676 or any other person having an interest in the proceeds payable
1677 under such contract or policy, for the purpose and with the
1678 intent of effecting settlement of such claims, loss, or damage
1679 under such contract or policy on less favorable terms than those
1680 provided in, and contemplated by, such contract or policy;
1681 3. Committing or performing with such frequency as to
1682 indicate a general business practice any of the following:
1683 a. Failing to adopt and implement standards for the proper
1684 investigation of claims;
1685 b. Misrepresenting pertinent facts or insurance policy
1686 provisions relating to coverages at issue;
1687 c. Failing to acknowledge and act promptly upon
1688 communications with respect to claims;
1689 d. Denying claims without conducting reasonable
1690 investigations based upon available information;
1691 e. Failing to affirm or deny full or partial coverage of
1692 claims, and, as to partial coverage, the dollar amount or extent
1693 of coverage, or failing to provide a written statement that the
1694 claim is being investigated, upon the written request of the
1695 insured within 30 days after proof-of-loss statements have been
1696 completed;
1697 f. Failing to promptly provide a reasonable explanation in
1698 writing to the insured of the basis in the insurance policy, in
1699 relation to the facts or applicable law, for denial of a claim
1700 or for the offer of a compromise settlement;
Page 68 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
1701 g. Failing to promptly notify the insured of any
1702 additional information necessary for the processing of a claim;
1703 h. Failing to clearly explain the nature of the requested
1704 information and the reasons why such information is necessary;
1705 or
1706 i. Failing to pay personal injury protection insurance
1707 claims within the time periods required by s. 627.736(4)(b). The
1708 office may order the insurer to pay restitution to a
1709 policyholder, medical provider, or other claimant, including
1710 interest at a rate consistent with the amount set forth in s.
1711 55.03(1), for the time period within which an insurer fails to
1712 pay claims as required by law. Restitution is in addition to any
1713 other penalties allowed by law, including, but not limited to,
1714 the suspension of the insurer's certificate of authority; or
1715 j. Altering or amending an insurance adjuster's report
1716 without:
1717 (I) Providing a detailed explanation as to why any change
1718 that has the effect of reducing the estimate of the loss was
1719 made; and
1720 (II) Including on the report or as an addendum to the
1721 report a detailed list of all changes made to the report and the
1722 identity of the person who ordered each change; or
1723 (III) Retaining all versions of the report, and including
1724 within each such version, for each change made within such
1725 version of the report, the identity of each person who made or
Page 69 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
1726 ordered such change; or
1727 4. Failing to pay undisputed amounts of partial or full
1728 benefits owed under first-party property insurance policies
1729 within 60 days after an insurer receives notice of a residential
1730 property insurance claim, determines the amounts of partial or
1731 full benefits, and agrees to coverage, unless payment of the
1732 undisputed benefits is prevented by factors beyond the control
1733 of the insurer as defined in s. 627.70131(5).
1734 (o) Illegal dealings in premiums; excess or reduced
1735 charges for insurance.—
1736 1. Knowingly collecting any sum as a premium or charge for
1737 insurance, which is not then provided, or is not in due course
1738 to be provided, subject to acceptance of the risk by the
1739 insurer, by an insurance policy issued by an insurer as
1740 permitted by this code.
1741 2. Knowingly collecting as a premium or charge for
1742 insurance any sum in excess of or less than the premium or
1743 charge applicable to such insurance, in accordance with the
1744 applicable classifications and rates as filed with and approved
1745 by the office, and as specified in the policy; or, in cases when
1746 classifications, premiums, or rates are not required by this
1747 code to be so filed and approved, premiums and charges collected
1748 from a Florida resident in excess of or less than those
1749 specified in the policy and as fixed by the insurer.
1750 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this provision shall
Page 70 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
1751 not be deemed to prohibit the charging and collection, by
1752 surplus lines agents licensed under part VIII of this chapter,
1753 of the amount of applicable state and federal taxes, or fees as
1754 authorized by s. 626.916(2), in addition to the premium required
1755 by the insurer or the charging and collection, by licensed
1756 agents, of the exact amount of any discount or other such fee
1757 charged by a credit card facility in connection with the use of
1758 a credit card, as authorized by subparagraph (q)3., in addition
1759 to the premium required by the insurer. This subparagraph shall
1760 not be construed to prohibit collection of a premium for a
1761 universal life or a variable or indeterminate value insurance
1762 policy made in accordance with the terms of the contract.
1763 3.a. Imposing or requesting an additional premium for
1764 bodily injury liability coverage, property damage liability
1765 coverage a policy of motor vehicle liability, personal injury
1766 protection, medical payments coverage payment, or collision
1767 coverage in a motor vehicle liability policy insurance or any
1768 combination thereof or refusing to renew the policy solely
1769 because the insured was involved in a motor vehicle accident
1770 unless the insurer's file contains information from which the
1771 insurer in good faith determines that the insured was
1772 substantially at fault in the accident.
1773 b. An insurer which imposes and collects such a surcharge
1774 or which refuses to renew such policy shall, in conjunction with
1775 the notice of premium due or notice of nonrenewal, notify the
Page 71 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
1776 named insured that he or she is entitled to reimbursement of
1777 such amount or renewal of the policy under the conditions listed
1778 below and will subsequently reimburse him or her or renew the
1779 policy, if the named insured demonstrates that the operator
1780 involved in the accident was:
1781 (I) Lawfully parked;
1782 (II) Reimbursed by, or on behalf of, a person responsible
1783 for the accident or has a judgment against such person;
1784 (III) Struck in the rear by another vehicle headed in the
1785 same direction and was not convicted of a moving traffic
1786 violation in connection with the accident;
1787 (IV) Hit by a "hit-and-run" driver, if the accident was
1788 reported to the proper authorities within 24 hours after
1789 discovering the accident;
1790 (V) Not convicted of a moving traffic violation in
1791 connection with the accident, but the operator of the other
1792 automobile involved in such accident was convicted of a moving
1793 traffic violation;
1794 (VI) Finally adjudicated not to be liable by a court of
1795 competent jurisdiction;
1796 (VII) In receipt of a traffic citation which was dismissed
1797 or nolle prossed; or
1798 (VIII) Not at fault as evidenced by a written statement
1799 from the insured establishing facts demonstrating lack of fault
1800 which are not rebutted by information in the insurer's file from
Page 72 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
1801 which the insurer in good faith determines that the insured was
1802 substantially at fault.
1803 c. In addition to the other provisions of this
1804 subparagraph, an insurer may not fail to renew a policy if the
1805 insured has had only one accident in which he or she was at
1806 fault within the current 3-year period. However, an insurer may
1807 nonrenew a policy for reasons other than accidents in accordance
1808 with s. 627.728. This subparagraph does not prohibit nonrenewal
1809 of a policy under which the insured has had three or more
1810 accidents, regardless of fault, during the most recent 3-year
1811 period.
1812 4. Imposing or requesting an additional premium for, or
1813 refusing to renew, a policy for motor vehicle insurance solely
1814 because the insured committed a noncriminal traffic infraction
1815 as described in s. 318.14 unless the infraction is:
1816 a. A second infraction committed within an 18-month
1817 period, or a third or subsequent infraction committed within a
1818 36-month period.
1819 b. A violation of s. 316.183, when such violation is a
1820 result of exceeding the lawful speed limit by more than 15 miles
1821 per hour.
1822 5. Upon the request of the insured, the insurer and
1823 licensed agent shall supply to the insured the complete proof of
1824 fault or other criteria which justifies the additional charge or
1825 cancellation.
Page 73 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
1826 6. No insurer shall impose or request an additional
1827 premium for motor vehicle insurance, cancel or refuse to issue a
1828 policy, or refuse to renew a policy because the insured or the
1829 applicant is a handicapped or physically disabled person, so
1830 long as such handicap or physical disability does not
1831 substantially impair such person's mechanically assisted driving
1832 ability.
1833 7. No insurer may cancel or otherwise terminate any
1834 insurance contract or coverage, or require execution of a
1835 consent to rate endorsement, during the stated policy term for
1836 the purpose of offering to issue, or issuing, a similar or
1837 identical contract or coverage to the same insured with the same
1838 exposure at a higher premium rate or continuing an existing
1839 contract or coverage with the same exposure at an increased
1840 premium.
1841 8. No insurer may issue a nonrenewal notice on any
1842 insurance contract or coverage, or require execution of a
1843 consent to rate endorsement, for the purpose of offering to
1844 issue, or issuing, a similar or identical contract or coverage
1845 to the same insured at a higher premium rate or continuing an
1846 existing contract or coverage at an increased premium without
1847 meeting any applicable notice requirements.
1848 9. No insurer shall, with respect to premiums charged for
1849 motor vehicle insurance, unfairly discriminate solely on the
1850 basis of age, sex, marital status, or scholastic achievement.
Page 74 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
1851 10. Imposing or requesting an additional premium for motor
1852 vehicle comprehensive or uninsured motorist coverage solely
1853 because the insured was involved in a motor vehicle accident or
1854 was convicted of a moving traffic violation.
1855 11. No insurer shall cancel or issue a nonrenewal notice
1856 on any insurance policy or contract without complying with any
1857 applicable cancellation or nonrenewal provision required under
1858 the Florida Insurance Code.
1859 12. No insurer shall impose or request an additional
1860 premium, cancel a policy, or issue a nonrenewal notice on any
1861 insurance policy or contract because of any traffic infraction
1862 when adjudication has been withheld and no points have been
1863 assessed pursuant to s. 318.14(9) and (10). However, this
1864 subparagraph does not apply to traffic infractions involving
1865 accidents in which the insurer has incurred a loss due to the
1866 fault of the insured.
1867 Section 36. Paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of section
1868 626.989, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1869 626.989 Investigation by department or Division of
1870 Criminal Investigations; compliance; immunity; confidential
1871 information; reports to division; division investigator's power
1872 of arrest.—
1873 (1) For the purposes of this section:
1874 (a) A person commits a "fraudulent insurance act" if the
1875 person:
Page 75 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
1876 1. Knowingly and with intent to defraud presents, causes
1877 to be presented, or prepares with knowledge or belief that it
1878 will be presented, to or by an insurer, self-insurer, self-
1879 insurance fund, servicing corporation, purported insurer,
1880 broker, or any agent thereof, any written statement as part of,
1881 or in support of, an application for the issuance of, or the
1882 rating of, any insurance policy, or a claim for payment or other
1883 benefit pursuant to any insurance policy, which the person knows
1884 to contain materially false information concerning any fact
1885 material thereto or if the person conceals, for the purpose of
1886 misleading another, information concerning any fact material
1887 thereto.
1888 2. Knowingly submits:
1889 a. A false, misleading, or fraudulent application or other
1890 document when applying for licensure as a health care clinic,
1891 seeking an exemption from licensure as a health care clinic, or
1892 demonstrating compliance with part X of chapter 400 with an
1893 intent to use the license, exemption from licensure, or
1894 demonstration of compliance to provide services or seek
1895 reimbursement under a motor vehicle liability policy's medical
1896 payments coverage the Florida Motor Vehicle No-Fault Law.
1897 b. A claim for payment or other benefit under a motor
1898 vehicle liability policy's medical payments coverage, pursuant
1899 to a personal injury protection insurance policy under the
1900 Florida Motor Vehicle No-Fault Law if the person knows that the
Page 76 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
1901 payee knowingly submitted a false, misleading, or fraudulent
1902 application or other document when applying for licensure as a
1903 health care clinic, seeking an exemption from licensure as a
1904 health care clinic, or demonstrating compliance with part X of
1905 chapter 400.
1906 Section 37. Subsection (1) of section 627.06501, Florida
1907 Statutes, is amended to read:
1908 627.06501 Insurance discounts for certain persons
1909 completing driver improvement course.—
1910 (1) Any rate, rating schedule, or rating manual for the
1911 liability, medical payments personal injury protection, and
1912 collision coverages of a motor vehicle insurance policy filed
1913 with the office may provide for an appropriate reduction in
1914 premium charges as to such coverages if when the principal
1915 operator on the covered vehicle has successfully completed a
1916 driver improvement course approved and certified by the
1917 Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles which is
1918 effective in reducing crash or violation rates, or both, as
1919 determined pursuant to s. 318.1451(5). Any discount, not to
1920 exceed 10 percent, used by an insurer is presumed to be
1921 appropriate unless credible data demonstrates otherwise.
1922 Section 38. Subsection (15) is added to section 627.0651,
1923 Florida Statutes, to read:
1924 627.0651 Making and use of rates for motor vehicle
1925 insurance.—
Page 77 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
1926 (15) Rate filings for motor vehicle liability policies
1927 that implement the financial responsibility requirements of s.
1928 324.022 in effect January 1, 2027, except for commercial motor
1929 vehicle insurance policies exempt under paragraph (14)(a), must
1930 reflect such financial responsibility requirements and may be
1931 approved only through the file and use process in accordance
1932 with paragraph (1)(a).
1933 Section 39. Subsection (1) of section 627.0652, Florida
1934 Statutes, is amended to read:
1935 627.0652 Insurance discounts for certain persons
1936 completing safety course.—
1937 (1) Any rates, rating schedules, or rating manuals for the
1938 liability, medical payments personal injury protection, and
1939 collision coverages of a motor vehicle insurance policy filed
1940 with the office must shall provide for an appropriate reduction
1941 in premium charges as to such coverages if when the principal
1942 operator on the covered vehicle is an insured 55 years of age or
1943 older who has successfully completed a motor vehicle accident
1944 prevention course approved by the Department of Highway Safety
1945 and Motor Vehicles. Any discount used by an insurer is presumed
1946 to be appropriate unless credible data demonstrates otherwise.
1947 Section 40. Subsections (1), (3), and (6) of section
1948 627.0653, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
1949 627.0653 Insurance discounts for specified motor vehicle
1950 equipment.—
Page 78 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
1951 (1) Any rates, rating schedules, or rating manuals for the
1952 liability, medical payments personal injury protection, and
1953 collision coverages of a motor vehicle insurance policy filed
1954 with the office must shall provide a premium discount if the
1955 insured vehicle is equipped with factory-installed, four-wheel
1956 antilock brakes.
1957 (3) Any rates, rating schedules, or rating manuals for
1958 personal injury protection coverage and medical payments
1959 coverage, if offered, of a motor vehicle insurance policy filed
1960 with the office must shall provide a premium discount if the
1961 insured vehicle is equipped with one or more air bags that which
1962 are factory installed.
1963 (6) The Office of Insurance Regulation may approve a
1964 premium discount to any rates, rating schedules, or rating
1965 manuals for the liability, medical payments personal injury
1966 protection, and collision coverages of a motor vehicle insurance
1967 policy filed with the office if the insured vehicle is equipped
1968 with an automated driving system or electronic vehicle collision
1969 avoidance technology that is factory installed or a retrofitted
1970 system and that complies with National Highway Traffic Safety
1971 Administration standards.
1972 Section 41. Section 627.4132, Florida Statutes, is amended
1973 to read:
1974 627.4132 Stacking of coverages prohibited.—If an insured
1975 or named insured is protected by any type of motor vehicle
Page 79 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
1976 insurance policy providing primary bodily injury and property
1977 damage for liability, personal injury protection, or other
1978 coverage, the policy must shall provide that the insured or
1979 named insured is protected only to the extent of the coverage
1980 she or he has on the vehicle involved in the accident. However,
1981 if none of the insured's or named insured's vehicles are is
1982 involved in the accident, coverage is available only to the
1983 extent of coverage on any one of the vehicles with applicable
1984 coverage. Coverage on any other vehicles may shall not be added
1985 to or stacked upon that coverage. This section does not apply:
1986 (1) Apply to uninsured motorist coverage that which is
1987 separately governed by s. 627.727.
1988 (2) To Reduce the coverage available by reason of
1989 insurance policies insuring different named insureds.
1990 Section 42. Subsection (1) of section 627.4137, Florida
1991 Statutes, is amended to read:
1992 627.4137 Disclosure of certain information required.—
1993 (1) Each insurer that provides which does or may provide
1994 liability insurance coverage to pay all or a portion of any
1995 claim which might be made shall provide, within 30 days after of
1996 the written request of the claimant or the claimant's attorney,
1997 a statement, under oath, of a corporate officer or the insurer's
1998 claims manager or superintendent setting forth the following
1999 information with regard to each known policy of insurance,
2000 including excess or umbrella insurance:
Page 80 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
2001 (a) The name of the insurer.
2002 (b) The name of each insured.
2003 (c) The limits of the liability coverage.
2004 (d) A statement of any policy or coverage defense which
2005 such insurer reasonably believes is available to such insurer at
2006 the time of filing such statement.
2007 (e) A copy of the policy.
2008
2009 In addition, the insured, or her or his insurance agent, upon
2010 written request of the claimant or the claimant's attorney,
2011 shall disclose the name and coverage of each known insurer to
2012 the claimant and shall forward such request for information as
2013 required by this subsection to all affected insurers. The
2014 insurer shall then supply the information required in this
2015 subsection to the claimant within 30 days after of receipt of
2016 such request. If an insurer fails to timely comply with this
2017 subsection, the claimant may file an action in a court of
2018 competent jurisdiction to enforce this section. If the court
2019 determines that the insurer violated this subsection, the
2020 claimant is entitled to an award of reasonable attorney fees and
2021 costs, payable by the insurer.
2022 Section 43. Section 627.7263, Florida Statutes, is amended
2023 to read:
2024 627.7263 Rental and leasing driver's insurance to be
2025 primary; exception.—
Page 81 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
2026 (1) The valid and collectible liability insurance or
2027 personal injury protection insurance providing coverage for the
2028 lessor of a motor vehicle for rent or lease is primary unless
2029 otherwise stated in at least 10-point type on the face of the
2030 rental or lease agreement. Such insurance is primary for the
2031 limits of liability and personal injury protection coverage as
2032 required under s. 324.021(7) by ss. 324.021(7) and 627.736.
2033 (2) If the lessee's coverage is to be primary, the rental
2034 or lease agreement must contain the following language, in at
2035 least 10-point type:
2036
2037 "The valid and collectible liability insurance and
2038 personal injury protection insurance of an any
2039 authorized rental or leasing driver is primary for the
2040 limits of liability and personal injury protection
2041 coverage required under s. 324.021(7) by ss.
2042 324.021(7) and 627.736, Florida Statutes."
2043 Section 44. Subsections (1) and (7) of section 627.727,
2044 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
2045 627.727 Motor vehicle insurance; uninsured and
2046 underinsured vehicle coverage; insolvent insurer protection.—
2047 (1) A No motor vehicle liability insurance policy that
2048 which provides bodily injury liability coverage may not shall be
2049 delivered or issued for delivery in this state with respect to
2050 any specifically insured or identified motor vehicle registered
Page 82 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
2051 or principally garaged in this state unless uninsured motor
2052 vehicle coverage is provided therein or supplemental thereto for
2053 the protection of persons insured thereunder who are legally
2054 entitled to recover damages from owners or operators of
2055 uninsured motor vehicles because of bodily injury, sickness, or
2056 disease, including death, resulting therefrom. However, the
2057 coverage required under this section is not applicable if when,
2058 or to the extent that, an insured named in the policy makes a
2059 written rejection of the coverage on behalf of all insureds
2060 under the policy. If When a motor vehicle is leased for a period
2061 of 1 year or longer and the lessor of such vehicle, by the terms
2062 of the lease contract, provides liability coverage on the leased
2063 vehicle, the lessee of such vehicle has shall have the sole
2064 privilege to reject uninsured motorist coverage or to select
2065 lower limits than the bodily injury liability limits, regardless
2066 of whether the lessor is qualified as a self-insurer pursuant to
2067 s. 324.171. Unless an insured, or a lessee having the privilege
2068 of rejecting uninsured motorist coverage, requests such coverage
2069 or requests higher uninsured motorist limits in writing, the
2070 coverage or such higher uninsured motorist limits need not be
2071 provided in or supplemental to any other policy that which
2072 renews, extends, changes, supersedes, or replaces an existing
2073 policy with the same bodily injury liability limits when an
2074 insured or lessee had rejected the coverage. When an insured or
2075 lessee has initially selected limits of uninsured motorist
Page 83 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
2076 coverage lower than her or his bodily injury liability limits,
2077 higher limits of uninsured motorist coverage need not be
2078 provided in or supplemental to any other policy that which
2079 renews, extends, changes, supersedes, or replaces an existing
2080 policy with the same bodily injury liability limits unless an
2081 insured requests higher uninsured motorist coverage in writing.
2082 The rejection or selection of lower limits must shall be made on
2083 a form approved by the office. The form must shall fully advise
2084 the applicant of the nature of the coverage and must shall state
2085 that the coverage is equal to bodily injury liability limits
2086 unless lower limits are requested or the coverage is rejected.
2087 The heading of the form must shall be in 12-point bold type and
2088 must shall state: "You are electing not to purchase certain
2089 valuable coverage that which protects you and your family or you
2090 are purchasing uninsured motorist limits less than your bodily
2091 injury liability limits when you sign this form. Please read
2092 carefully." If this form is signed by a named insured, it will
2093 be conclusively presumed that there was an informed, knowing
2094 rejection of coverage or election of lower limits on behalf of
2095 all insureds. The insurer shall notify the named insured at
2096 least annually of her or his options as to the coverage required
2097 by this section. Such notice must shall be part of, and attached
2098 to, the notice of premium, must shall provide for a means to
2099 allow the insured to request such coverage, and must shall be
2100 given in a manner approved by the office. Receipt of this notice
Page 84 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
2101 does not constitute an affirmative waiver of the insured's right
2102 to uninsured motorist coverage if where the insured has not
2103 signed a selection or rejection form. The coverage described
2104 under this section must shall be over and above, but may shall
2105 not duplicate, the benefits available to an insured under any
2106 workers' compensation law, personal injury protection benefits,
2107 disability benefits law, or similar law; under any automobile
2108 medical payments expense coverage; under any motor vehicle
2109 liability insurance coverage; or from the owner or operator of
2110 the uninsured motor vehicle or any other person or organization
2111 jointly or severally liable together with such owner or operator
2112 for the accident,; and such coverage must shall cover any the
2113 difference, if any, between the sum of such benefits and the
2114 damages sustained, up to the maximum amount of such coverage
2115 provided under this section. The amount of coverage available
2116 under this section may shall not be reduced by a setoff against
2117 any coverage, including liability insurance. Such coverage does
2118 shall not inure directly or indirectly to the benefit of any
2119 workers' compensation or disability benefits carrier or any
2120 person or organization qualifying as a self-insurer under any
2121 workers' compensation or disability benefits law or similar law.
2122 (7) The legal liability of an uninsured motorist coverage
2123 insurer includes does not include damages in tort for pain,
2124 suffering, disability, physical impairment, disfigurement,
2125 mental anguish, and inconvenience, and the loss of capacity for
Page 85 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
2126 the enjoyment of life experienced in the past and to be
2127 experienced in the future unless the injury or disease is
2128 described in one or more of paragraphs (a)-(d) of s. 627.737(2).
2129 Section 45. Section 627.7275, Florida Statutes, is amended
2130 to read:
2131 627.7275 Required coverages in motor vehicle insurance
2132 policies; availability to certain applicants liability.—
2133 (1) A motor vehicle insurance policy providing personal
2134 injury protection as set forth in s. 627.736 may not be
2135 delivered or issued for delivery in this state for a with
2136 respect to any specifically insured or identified motor vehicle
2137 registered or principally garaged in this state must provide
2138 bodily injury liability coverage and unless the policy also
2139 provides coverage for property damage liability coverage as
2140 required under ss. 324.022 and 324.151 by s. 324.022.
2141 (2)(a) Insurers writing motor vehicle insurance in this
2142 state shall make available, subject to the insurers' usual
2143 underwriting restrictions:
2144 1. Coverage under policies as described in subsection (1)
2145 to an applicant for private passenger motor vehicle insurance
2146 coverage who is seeking the coverage in order to reinstate the
2147 applicant's driving privileges in this state if the driving
2148 privileges were revoked or suspended pursuant to s. 316.646 or
2149 s. 324.0221 due to the failure of the applicant to maintain
2150 required security.
Page 86 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
2151 2. Coverage under policies as described in subsection (1),
2152 which includes bodily injury also provides liability coverage
2153 and property damage liability coverage for bodily injury, death,
2154 and property damage arising out of the ownership, maintenance,
2155 or use of the motor vehicle in an amount not less than the
2156 minimum limits required under described in s. 324.021(7) or s.
2157 324.023 and which conforms to the requirements of s. 324.151, to
2158 an applicant for private passenger motor vehicle insurance
2159 coverage who is seeking the coverage in order to reinstate the
2160 applicant's driving privileges in this state after such
2161 privileges were revoked or suspended under s. 316.193 or s.
2162 322.26(2) for driving under the influence.
2163 (b) The policies described in paragraph (a) must shall be
2164 issued for at least 6 months. After the insurer has issued the
2165 policy, the insurer shall notify the Department of Highway
2166 Safety and Motor Vehicles that the policy is in full force and
2167 effect. Once the provisions of the policy become effective, the
2168 bodily injury liability and property damage liability coverages
2169 for bodily injury, property damage, and personal injury
2170 protection may not be reduced below the minimum limits required
2171 under s. 324.021 or s. 324.023 during the policy period.
2172 (c) This subsection controls to the extent of any conflict
2173 with any other section.
2174 (d) An insurer issuing a policy subject to this section
2175 may cancel the policy if, during the policy term, the named
Page 87 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
2176 insured, or any other operator who resides in the same household
2177 or customarily operates an automobile insured under the policy,
2178 has his or her driver license suspended or revoked.
2179 (e) This subsection does not require an insurer to offer a
2180 policy of insurance to an applicant if such offer would be
2181 inconsistent with the insurer's underwriting guidelines and
2182 procedures.
2183 Section 46. Effective upon this act becoming a law,
2184 section 627.7278, Florida Statutes, is created to read:
2185 627.7278 Applicability and construction; notice to
2186 policyholders.—
2187 (1) As used in this section, the term "minimum security
2188 requirements" means security in the amounts required by s.
2189 324.022 which enables a person to respond in damages for
2190 liability on account of crashes arising out of the ownership,
2191 maintenance, or use of a motor vehicle.
2192 (2) Effective January 1, 2027:
2193 (a) Motor vehicle insurance policies issued or renewed on
2194 or after January 1, 2027, may not include personal injury
2195 protection.
2196 (b) All persons subject to s. 324.022, s. 324.032, s.
2197 627.7415, or s. 627.742 must meet at least the minimum security
2198 requirements and maintain the required amount of coverage.
2199 (c) A motor vehicle insurance policy issued before January
2200 1, 2027, which provides personal injury protection and property
Page 88 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
2201 damage liability coverage that meets the requirements of s.
2202 324.022 on December 31, 2026, but that does not meet minimum
2203 security requirements in effect on or after January 1, 2027, is
2204 deemed to meet minimum security requirements until such policy
2205 is renewed, nonrenewed, or canceled on or after January 1, 2027.
2206 Sections 400.9905, 400.991, 456.057, 456.072, 626.9541(1)(i),
2207 627.7263, 627.727, 627.730-627.7405, 627.748, and 817.234,
2208 Florida Statutes 2025, remain in full force and effect for motor
2209 vehicle accidents covered under a policy issued under the
2210 Florida Motor Vehicle No-Fault Law before January 1, 2027, until
2211 the policy is renewed, nonrenewed, or canceled on or after
2212 January 1, 2027.
2213 (3) An insurer shall allow each insured who has a new or
2214 renewal policy providing personal injury protection which
2215 becomes effective before January 1, 2027, and whose policy does
2216 not meet minimum security requirements on or after January 1,
2217 2027, to change coverages so as to eliminate personal injury
2218 protection. Any reduction in the premium must be refunded by the
2219 insurer. The insurer may not impose on the insured an additional
2220 fee or charge that applies solely to a change in coverage;
2221 however, the insurer may charge an additional required premium
2222 that is actuarially indicated.
2223 (4) By October 1, 2026, each motor vehicle insurer shall
2224 provide notice of this section to each motor vehicle insurance
2225 policyholder who is subject to this section. The notice is
Page 89 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
2226 subject to approval by the office and must clearly inform the
2227 policyholder that:
2228 (a) The Florida Motor Vehicle No-Fault Law is repealed
2229 effective January 1, 2027, and that on or after that date, the
2230 insured is no longer required to maintain personal injury
2231 protection insurance coverage, that personal injury protection
2232 insurance coverage is no longer available for purchase in this
2233 state, and that new or renewal policies issued on or after that
2234 date will not contain that coverage.
2235 (b) Effective January 1, 2027, a person subject to the
2236 financial responsibility requirements of s. 324.022 must
2237 maintain minimum security requirements that enable the person to
2238 respond in damages for liability on account of accidents arising
2239 out of the ownership, maintenance, or use of a motor vehicle in
2240 the following amounts:
2241 1. Twenty-five thousand dollars for bodily injury to, or
2242 the death of, one person in any one crash and, subject to such
2243 limits for one person, in the amount of $50,000 for bodily
2244 injury to, or the death of, two or more persons in any one
2245 crash; and
2246 2. Ten thousand dollars for damage to, or destruction of,
2247 the property of others in any one crash.
2248 (c) Bodily injury liability coverage protects the insured,
2249 up to the coverage limits, against loss if the insured is
2250 legally responsible for bodily injury to, or the death of,
Page 90 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
2251 others in a motor vehicle crash.
2252 (d) The policyholder may obtain uninsured and underinsured
2253 motorist coverage that provides benefits, up to the limits of
2254 such coverage, to a policyholder or other insured entitled to
2255 recover damages for bodily injury, sickness, disease, or death
2256 resulting from a motor vehicle crash involving an uninsured or
2257 underinsured owner or operator of a motor vehicle.
2258 (e) If the policyholder's new or renewal motor vehicle
2259 insurance policy is effective before January 1, 2027, and
2260 contains personal injury protection and property damage
2261 liability coverage as required by state law before January 1,
2262 2027, but does not meet minimum security requirements on or
2263 after January 1, 2027, the policy is deemed to meet minimum
2264 security requirements until it is renewed, nonrenewed, or
2265 canceled on or after January 1, 2027.
2266 (f) A policyholder whose new or renewal policy becomes
2267 effective before January 1, 2027, but does not meet minimum
2268 security requirements on or after January 1, 2027, may change
2269 coverages under the policy so as to eliminate personal injury
2270 protection and to obtain coverage providing minimum security
2271 requirements, including bodily injury liability coverage, which
2272 are effective on or after January 1, 2027.
2273 (g) If the policyholder has any questions, he or she
2274 should contact the person named at the telephone number provided
2275 in the notice.
Page 91 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
2276 Section 47. Paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of section
2277 627.728, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
2278 627.728 Cancellations; nonrenewals.—
2279 (1) As used in this section, the term:
2280 (a) "Policy" means the bodily injury and property damage
2281 liability, personal injury protection, medical payments,
2282 comprehensive, collision, and uninsured motorist coverage
2283 portions of a policy of motor vehicle insurance delivered or
2284 issued for delivery in this state:
2285 1. Insuring a natural person as named insured or one or
2286 more related individuals who are residents resident of the same
2287 household; and
2288 2. Insuring only a motor vehicle of the private passenger
2289 type or station wagon type which is not used as a public or
2290 livery conveyance for passengers or rented to others; or
2291 insuring any other four-wheel motor vehicle having a load
2292 capacity of 1,500 pounds or less which is not used in the
2293 occupation, profession, or business of the insured other than
2294 farming; other than any policy issued under an automobile
2295 insurance assigned risk plan or covering garage, automobile
2296 sales agency, repair shop, service station, or public parking
2297 place operation hazards.
2298
2299 The term "policy" does not include a binder as defined in s.
2300 627.420 unless the duration of the binder period exceeds 60
Page 92 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
2301 days.
2302 Section 48. Subsection (1), paragraph (a) of subsection
2303 (5), and subsections (6) and (7) of section 627.7295, Florida
2304 Statutes, are amended to read:
2305 627.7295 Motor vehicle insurance contracts.—
2306 (1) As used in this section, the term:
2307 (a) "Policy" means a motor vehicle insurance policy that
2308 provides bodily injury liability personal injury protection
2309 coverage and, property damage liability coverage, or both.
2310 (b) "Binder" means a binder that provides motor vehicle
2311 bodily injury liability coverage personal injury protection and
2312 property damage liability coverage.
2313 (5)(a) A licensed general lines agent may charge a per-
2314 policy fee of up to not to exceed $10 to cover the
2315 administrative costs of the agent associated with selling the
2316 motor vehicle insurance policy if the policy provides covers
2317 only bodily injury liability coverage personal injury protection
2318 coverage as provided by s. 627.736 and property damage liability
2319 coverage under as provided by s. 627.7275 and if no other
2320 insurance is sold or issued in conjunction with or collateral to
2321 the policy. The fee is not considered part of the premium.
2322 (6) If a motor vehicle owner's driver license, license
2323 plate, and registration have previously been suspended pursuant
2324 to s. 316.646 or s. 627.733, an insurer may cancel a new policy
2325 only as provided in s. 627.7275.
Page 93 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
2326 (7) A policy of private passenger motor vehicle insurance
2327 or a binder for such a policy may be initially issued in this
2328 state only if, before the effective date of such binder or
2329 policy, the insurer or agent has collected from the insured an
2330 amount equal to at least 1 month's premium. An insurer, agent,
2331 or premium finance company may not, directly or indirectly, take
2332 any action that will result resulting in the insured paying
2333 having paid from the insured's own funds an amount less than the
2334 1 month's premium required by this subsection. This subsection
2335 applies regardless of without regard to whether the premium is
2336 financed by a premium finance company or is paid pursuant to a
2337 periodic payment plan of an insurer or an insurance agent.
2338 (a) This subsection does not apply:
2339 1. If an insured or member of the insured's family is
2340 renewing or replacing a policy or a binder for such policy
2341 written by the same insurer or a member of the same insurer
2342 group. This subsection does not apply
2343 2. To an insurer that issues private passenger motor
2344 vehicle coverage primarily to active duty or former military
2345 personnel or their dependents. This subsection does not apply
2346 3. If all policy payments are paid pursuant to a payroll
2347 deduction plan, an automatic electronic funds transfer payment
2348 plan from the policyholder, or a recurring credit card or debit
2349 card agreement with the insurer.
2350 (b) This subsection and subsection (4) do not apply if:
Page 94 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
2351 1. All policy payments to an insurer are paid pursuant to
2352 an automatic electronic funds transfer payment plan from an
2353 agent, a managing general agent, or a premium finance company
2354 and if the policy includes, at a minimum, bodily injury
2355 liability coverage and personal injury protection pursuant to
2356 ss. 627.730-627.7405; motor vehicle property damage liability
2357 coverage under pursuant to s. 627.7275; or and bodily injury
2358 liability in at least the amount of $10,000 because of bodily
2359 injury to, or death of, one person in any one accident and in
2360 the amount of $20,000 because of bodily injury to, or death of,
2361 two or more persons in any one accident. This subsection and
2362 subsection (4) do not apply if
2363 2. An insured has had a policy in effect for at least 6
2364 months, the insured's agent is terminated by the insurer that
2365 issued the policy, and the insured obtains coverage on the
2366 policy's renewal date with a new company through the terminated
2367 agent.
2368 Section 49. Section 627.7415, Florida Statutes, is amended
2369 to read:
2370 627.7415 Commercial motor vehicles; additional liability
2371 insurance coverage.—Beginning January 1, 2027, commercial motor
2372 vehicles, as defined in s. 207.002 or s. 320.01, operated upon
2373 the roads and highways of this state must shall be insured with
2374 the following minimum levels of combined bodily liability
2375 insurance and property damage liability insurance in addition to
Page 95 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
2376 any other insurance requirements:
2377 (1) Sixty Fifty thousand dollars per occurrence for a
2378 commercial motor vehicle with a gross vehicle weight of 26,000
2379 pounds or more, but less than 35,000 pounds.
2380 (2) One hundred twenty thousand dollars per occurrence for
2381 a commercial motor vehicle with a gross vehicle weight of 35,000
2382 pounds or more, but less than 44,000 pounds.
2383 (3) Three hundred thousand dollars per occurrence for a
2384 commercial motor vehicle with a gross vehicle weight of 44,000
2385 pounds or more.
2386 (4) All commercial motor vehicles subject to regulations
2387 of the United States Department of Transportation, 49 C.F.R.
2388 part 387, subparts A and B, and as may be hereinafter amended,
2389 shall be insured in an amount equivalent to the minimum levels
2390 of financial responsibility as set forth in such regulations.
2391
2392 A violation of this section is a noncriminal traffic infraction,
2393 punishable as a nonmoving violation as provided in chapter 318.
2394 Section 50. Subsections (1) and (3) of section 627.747,
2395 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
2396 627.747 Named driver exclusion.—
2397 (1) A private passenger motor vehicle policy may exclude
2398 the following coverages for all claims or suits resulting from
2399 the operation of a motor vehicle by an identified individual who
2400 is not a named insured, provided the identified individual is
Page 96 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
2401 named on the declarations page or by endorsement and the named
2402 insured consents in writing to such exclusion:
2403 (a) Notwithstanding the Florida Motor Vehicle No-Fault
2404 Law, the personal injury protection coverage specifically
2405 applicable to the identified individual's injuries, lost wages,
2406 and death benefits.
2407 (b) Property damage liability coverage.
2408 (b)(c) Bodily injury liability coverage, if required by
2409 law and purchased by the named insured.
2410 (c)(d) Uninsured motorist coverage for any damages
2411 sustained by the identified excluded individual, if the named
2412 insured has purchased such coverage.
2413 (d)(e) Any coverage the named insured is not required by
2414 law to purchase.
2415 (3) A driver excluded pursuant to this section must:
2416 (a) establish, maintain, and show proof of financial
2417 ability to respond for damages arising out of the ownership,
2418 maintenance, or use of a motor vehicle as required by chapter
2419 324; and
2420 (b) Maintain security as required by s. 627.733.
2421 Section 51. Paragraphs (b), (c), and (g) of subsection
2422 (7), paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (8), and paragraph (b)
2423 of subsection (16) of section 627.748, Florida Statutes, are
2424 amended to read:
2425 627.748 Transportation network companies.—
Page 97 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
2426 (7) TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY AND TNC DRIVER
2427 INSURANCE REQUIREMENTS.—
2428 (b) The following automobile insurance requirements apply
2429 while a participating TNC driver is logged on to the digital
2430 network but is not engaged in a prearranged ride:
2431 1. Automobile insurance that provides:
2432 a. A primary automobile liability coverage of at least
2433 $50,000 for death and bodily injury per person, $100,000 for
2434 death and bodily injury per incident, and $25,000 for property
2435 damage; and
2436 b. Personal injury protection benefits that meet the
2437 minimum coverage amounts required under ss. 627.730-627.7405;
2438 and
2439 c. Uninsured and underinsured vehicle coverage as required
2440 by s. 627.727.
2441 2. The coverage requirements of this paragraph may be
2442 satisfied by any of the following:
2443 a. Automobile insurance maintained by the TNC driver or
2444 the TNC vehicle owner;
2445 b. Automobile insurance maintained by the TNC; or
2446 c. A combination of sub-subparagraphs a. and b.
2447 (c)1. The TNC driver while following automobile insurance
2448 requirements apply while a TNC driver is engaged in a
2449 prearranged ride must maintain:
2450 1. automobile insurance that provides:
Page 98 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
2451 a. A Primary automobile liability coverage of at least $1
2452 million for death, bodily injury, and property damage; and
2453 b. Personal injury protection benefits that meet the
2454 minimum coverage amounts required of a limousine under ss.
2455 627.730-627.7405; and
2456 c. Uninsured and underinsured vehicle coverage as required
2457 by s. 627.727.
2458 2. The coverage requirements of this paragraph may be
2459 satisfied by any of the following:
2460 a. Automobile insurance maintained by the TNC driver or
2461 the TNC vehicle owner;
2462 b. Automobile insurance maintained by the TNC; or
2463 c. A combination of sub-subparagraphs a. and b.
2464 (g) Insurance satisfying the requirements under this
2465 subsection is deemed to satisfy the financial responsibility
2466 requirement for a motor vehicle under chapter 324 and the
2467 security required under s. 627.733 for any period when the TNC
2468 driver is logged onto the digital network or engaged in a
2469 prearranged ride.
2470 (8) TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY AND INSURER;
2471 DISCLOSURE; EXCLUSIONS.—
2472 (a) Before a TNC driver is allowed to accept a request for
2473 a prearranged ride on the digital network, the TNC must disclose
2474 in writing to the TNC driver:
2475 1. The insurance coverage, including the types of coverage
Page 99 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
2476 and the limits for each coverage, which the TNC provides while
2477 the TNC driver uses a TNC vehicle in connection with the TNC's
2478 digital network.
2479 2. That the TNC driver's own automobile insurance policy
2480 might not provide any coverage while the TNC driver is logged on
2481 to the digital network or is engaged in a prearranged ride,
2482 depending on the terms of the TNC driver's own automobile
2483 insurance policy.
2484 3. That the provision of rides for compensation which are
2485 not prearranged rides subjects the driver to the coverage
2486 requirements imposed under s. 324.032(1) and (2) and that
2487 failure to meet such coverage requirements subjects the TNC
2488 driver to penalties provided in s. 324.221, up to and including
2489 a misdemeanor of the second degree.
2490 (b)1. An insurer that provides an automobile liability
2491 insurance policy under this part may exclude any and all
2492 coverage afforded under the policy issued to an owner or
2493 operator of a TNC vehicle while driving that vehicle for any
2494 loss or injury that occurs while a TNC driver is logged on to a
2495 digital network or while a TNC driver provides a prearranged
2496 ride. Exclusions imposed under this subsection are limited to
2497 coverage while a TNC driver is logged on to a digital network or
2498 while a TNC driver provides a prearranged ride. This right to
2499 exclude all coverage may apply to any coverage included in an
2500 automobile insurance policy, including, but not limited to:
Page 100 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
2501 a. Liability coverage for bodily injury and property
2502 damage;
2503 b. Uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage;
2504 c. Medical payments coverage;
2505 d. Comprehensive physical damage coverage; and
2506 e. Collision physical damage coverage; and
2507 f. Personal injury protection.
2508 2. The exclusions described in subparagraph 1. apply
2509 notwithstanding any requirement under chapter 324. These
2510 exclusions do not affect or diminish coverage otherwise
2511 available for permissive drivers or resident relatives under the
2512 personal automobile insurance policy of the TNC driver or owner
2513 of the TNC vehicle who are not occupying the TNC vehicle at the
2514 time of loss. This section does not require that a personal
2515 automobile insurance policy provide coverage while the TNC
2516 driver is logged on to a digital network, while the TNC driver
2517 is engaged in a prearranged ride, or while the TNC driver
2518 otherwise uses a vehicle to transport riders for compensation.
2519 3. This section must not be construed to require an
2520 insurer to use any particular policy language or reference to
2521 this section in order to exclude any and all coverage for any
2522 loss or injury that occurs while a TNC driver is logged on to a
2523 digital network or while a TNC driver provides a prearranged
2524 ride.
2525 4. This section does not preclude an insurer from
Page 101 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
2526 providing primary or excess coverage for the TNC driver's
2527 vehicle by contract or endorsement.
2528 (16) LUXURY GROUND TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANIES.—
2529 (b) An entity may elect, upon written notification to the
2530 department, to be regulated as a luxury ground TNC. A luxury
2531 ground TNC must:
2532 1. Comply with all of the requirements of this section
2533 applicable to a TNC, including subsection (17), which do not
2534 conflict with subparagraph 2. or which do not prohibit the
2535 company from connecting riders to drivers who operate for-hire
2536 vehicles as defined in s. 320.01(15), including limousines and
2537 luxury sedans and excluding taxicabs.
2538 2. Maintain insurance coverage as required by subsection
2539 (7). However, if a prospective luxury ground TNC satisfies
2540 minimum financial responsibility through compliance with s.
2541 324.032(3) s. 324.032(2) by using self-insurance when it gives
2542 the department written notification of its election to be
2543 regulated as a luxury ground TNC, the luxury ground TNC may use
2544 self-insurance to meet the insurance requirements of subsection
2545 (7), so long as such self-insurance complies with s. 324.032(3)
2546 s. 324.032(2) and provides the limits of liability required by
2547 subsection (7).
2548 Section 52. Subsection (2) and paragraphs (a) and (c) of
2549 subsection (3) of section 627.7483, Florida Statutes, are
2550 amended to read:
Page 102 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
2551 627.7483 Peer-to-peer car sharing; insurance
2552 requirements.—
2553 (2) INSURANCE COVERAGE REQUIREMENTS.—
2554 (a)1. A peer-to-peer car-sharing program shall ensure
2555 that, during each car-sharing period, the shared vehicle owner
2556 and the shared vehicle driver are insured under a motor vehicle
2557 insurance policy that provides all of the following:
2558 a. Property damage liability coverage and bodily injury
2559 liability coverage that meet or exceed meets the minimum
2560 coverage amounts required under s. 324.022.
2561 b. Bodily injury liability coverage limits as described in
2562 s. 324.021(7)(a) and (b).
2563 c. Personal injury protection benefits that meet the
2564 minimum coverage amounts required under s. 627.736.
2565 d. Uninsured and underinsured vehicle coverage as required
2566 under s. 627.727.
2567 2. The peer-to-peer car-sharing program shall also ensure
2568 that the motor vehicle insurance policy under subparagraph 1.:
2569 a. Recognizes that the shared vehicle insured under the
2570 policy is made available and used through a peer-to-peer car-
2571 sharing program; or
2572 b. Does not exclude the use of a shared vehicle by a
2573 shared vehicle driver.
2574 (b)1. The insurance described under paragraph (a) may be
2575 satisfied by a motor vehicle insurance policy maintained by:
Page 103 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
2576 a. A shared vehicle owner;
2577 b. A shared vehicle driver;
2578 c. A peer-to-peer car-sharing program; or
2579 d. A combination of a shared vehicle owner, a shared
2580 vehicle driver, and a peer-to-peer car-sharing program.
2581 2. The insurance policy maintained in subparagraph 1.
2582 which satisfies the insurance requirements under paragraph (a)
2583 is primary during each car-sharing period. If a claim occurs
2584 during the car-sharing period in another state with minimum
2585 financial responsibility limits higher than those limits
2586 required under chapter 324, the coverage maintained under
2587 paragraph (a) satisfies the difference in minimum coverage
2588 amounts up to the applicable policy limits.
2589 3.a. If the insurance maintained by a shared vehicle owner
2590 or shared vehicle driver in accordance with subparagraph 1. has
2591 lapsed or does not provide the coverage required under paragraph
2592 (a), the insurance maintained by the peer-to-peer car-sharing
2593 program must provide the coverage required under paragraph (a),
2594 beginning with the first dollar of a claim, and must defend such
2595 claim, except under circumstances as set forth in subparagraph
2596 (3)(a)2.
2597 b. Coverage under a motor vehicle insurance policy
2598 maintained by the peer-to-peer car-sharing program must not be
2599 dependent on another motor vehicle insurer first denying a
2600 claim, and another motor vehicle insurance policy is not
Page 104 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
2601 required to first deny a claim.
2602 c. Notwithstanding any other law, statute, rule, or
2603 regulation to the contrary, a peer-to-peer car-sharing program
2604 has an insurable interest in a shared vehicle during the car-
2605 sharing period. This sub-subparagraph does not create liability
2606 for a peer-to-peer car-sharing program for maintaining the
2607 coverage required under paragraph (a) and under this paragraph,
2608 if applicable.
2609 d. A peer-to-peer car-sharing program may own and maintain
2610 as the named insured one or more policies of motor vehicle
2611 insurance which provide coverage for:
2612 (I) Liabilities assumed by the peer-to-peer car-sharing
2613 program under a peer–to–peer car-sharing program agreement;
2614 (II) Liability of the shared vehicle owner;
2615 (III) Liability of the shared vehicle driver;
2616 (IV) Damage or loss to the shared motor vehicle; or
2617 (V) Damage, loss, or injury to persons or property to
2618 satisfy the personal injury protection and uninsured and
2619 underinsured motorist coverage requirements of this section.
2620 e. Insurance required under paragraph (a), when maintained
2621 by a peer-to-peer car-sharing program, may be provided by an
2622 insurer authorized to do business in this state which is a
2623 member of the Florida Insurance Guaranty Association or an
2624 eligible surplus lines insurer that has a superior, excellent,
2625 exceptional, or equivalent financial strength rating by a rating
Page 105 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
2626 agency acceptable to the office. A peer-to-peer car-sharing
2627 program is not transacting in insurance when it maintains the
2628 insurance required under this section.
2629 (3) LIABILITIES AND INSURANCE EXCLUSIONS.—
2630 (a) Liability.—
2631 1. A peer-to-peer car-sharing program shall assume
2632 liability, except as provided in subparagraph 2., of a shared
2633 vehicle owner for bodily injury or property damage to third
2634 parties or uninsured and underinsured motorist or personal
2635 injury protection losses during the car-sharing period in an
2636 amount stated in the peer-to-peer car-sharing program agreement,
2637 which amount may not be less than those set forth in ss. 324.022
2638 and 627.727 ss. 324.021(7)(a) and (b), 324.022, 627.727, and
2639 627.736, respectively.
2640 2. The assumption of liability under subparagraph 1. does
2641 not apply if a shared vehicle owner:
2642 a. Makes an intentional or fraudulent material
2643 misrepresentation or omission to the peer-to-peer car-sharing
2644 program before the car-sharing period in which the loss occurs;
2645 or
2646 b. Acts in concert with a shared vehicle driver who fails
2647 to return the shared vehicle pursuant to the terms of the peer-
2648 to-peer car-sharing program agreement.
2649 3. The insurer, insurers, or peer-to-peer car-sharing
2650 program providing coverage under paragraph (2)(a) shall assume
Page 106 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
2651 primary liability for a claim when:
2652 a. A dispute exists over who was in control of the shared
2653 motor vehicle at the time of the loss, and the peer-to-peer car-
2654 sharing program does not have available, did not retain, or
2655 fails to provide the information required under subsection (5);
2656 or
2657 b. A dispute exists over whether the shared vehicle was
2658 returned to the alternatively agreed-upon location as required
2659 under subparagraph (1)(d)2.
2660 (c) Exclusions in motor vehicle insurance policies.—An
2661 authorized insurer that writes motor vehicle liability insurance
2662 in this state may exclude any coverage and the duty to defend or
2663 indemnify for any claim under a shared vehicle owner's motor
2664 vehicle insurance policy, including, but not limited to:
2665 1. Liability coverage for bodily injury and property
2666 damage;
2667 2. Personal injury protection coverage;
2668 3. Uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage;
2669 3.4. Medical payments coverage;
2670 4.5. Comprehensive physical damage coverage; and
2671 5.6. Collision physical damage coverage.
2672
2673 This paragraph does not invalidate or limit any exclusion
2674 contained in a motor vehicle insurance policy, including any
2675 insurance policy in use or approved for use which excludes
Page 107 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
2676 coverage for motor vehicles made available for rent, sharing, or
2677 hire or for any business use. This paragraph does not
2678 invalidate, limit, or restrict an insurer's ability under
2679 existing law to underwrite, cancel, or nonrenew any insurance
2680 policy.
2681 Section 53. Paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of section
2682 627.749, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
2683 627.749 Autonomous vehicles; insurance requirements.—
2684 (2) INSURANCE REQUIREMENTS.—
2685 (a) A fully autonomous vehicle with the automated driving
2686 system engaged while logged on to an on-demand autonomous
2687 vehicle network or engaged in a prearranged ride must be covered
2688 by a policy of automobile insurance which provides:
2689 1. Primary liability coverage of at least $1 million for
2690 death, bodily injury, and property damage.
2691 2. Personal injury protection benefits that meet the
2692 minimum coverage amounts required under ss. 627.730-627.7405.
2693 3. Uninsured and underinsured vehicle coverage as required
2694 under by s. 627.727.
2695 Section 54. Section 627.8405, Florida Statutes, is amended
2696 to read:
2697 627.8405 Prohibited acts; financing companies.—A No
2698 premium finance company shall, in a premium finance agreement or
2699 other agreement, may not finance the cost of or otherwise
2700 provide for the collection or remittance of dues, assessments,
Page 108 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
2701 fees, or other periodic payments of money for the cost of:
2702 (1) A membership in an automobile club. The term
2703 "automobile club" means a legal entity that which, in
2704 consideration of dues, assessments, or periodic payments of
2705 money, promises its members or subscribers to assist them in
2706 matters relating to the ownership, operation, use, or
2707 maintenance of a motor vehicle; however, the term this
2708 definition of "automobile club" does not include persons,
2709 associations, or corporations which are organized and operated
2710 solely for the purpose of conducting, sponsoring, or sanctioning
2711 motor vehicle races, exhibitions, or contests upon racetracks,
2712 or upon racecourses established and marked as such for the
2713 duration of such particular events. As used in this subsection,
2714 the term words "motor vehicle" has used herein have the same
2715 meaning as defined in chapter 320.
2716 (2) An accidental death and dismemberment policy sold in
2717 combination with a policy providing only bodily injury liability
2718 coverage personal injury protection and property damage
2719 liability coverage only policy.
2720 (3) Any product not regulated under the provisions of this
2721 insurance code.
2722
2723 This section also applies to premium financing by any insurance
2724 agent or insurance company under part XVI. The commission shall
2725 adopt rules to assure disclosure, at the time of sale, of
Page 109 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
2726 coverages financed with personal injury protection and shall
2727 prescribe the form of such disclosure.
2728 Section 55. Subsection (1) of section 627.915, Florida
2729 Statutes, is amended to read:
2730 627.915 Insurer experience reporting.—
2731 (1) Each insurer transacting private passenger motor
2732 vehicle automobile insurance in this state shall report certain
2733 information annually to the office. The information will be due
2734 on or before July 1 of each year. The information must shall be
2735 divided into the following categories: bodily injury liability;
2736 property damage liability; uninsured motorist; personal injury
2737 protection benefits; medical payments; and comprehensive and
2738 collision. The information given must shall be on direct
2739 insurance writings in the state alone and shall represent total
2740 limits data. The information set forth in paragraphs (a)-(f) is
2741 applicable to voluntary private passenger and Joint Underwriting
2742 Association private passenger writings and must shall be
2743 reported for each of the latest 3 calendar-accident years, with
2744 an evaluation date of March 31 of the current year. The
2745 information set forth in paragraphs (g)-(j) is applicable to
2746 voluntary private passenger writings and must shall be reported
2747 on a calendar-accident year basis ultimately seven times at
2748 seven different stages of development.
2749 (a) Premiums earned for the latest 3 calendar-accident
2750 years.
Page 110 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
2751 (b) Loss development factors and the historic development
2752 of those factors.
2753 (c) Policyholder dividends incurred.
2754 (d) Expenses for other acquisition and general expense.
2755 (e) Expenses for agents' commissions and taxes, licenses,
2756 and fees.
2757 (f) Profit and contingency factors as utilized in the
2758 insurer's automobile rate filings for the applicable years.
2759 (g) Losses paid.
2760 (h) Losses unpaid.
2761 (i) Loss adjustment expenses paid.
2762 (j) Loss adjustment expenses unpaid.
2763 Section 56. Subsections (2) and (3) of section 628.909,
2764 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
2765 628.909 Applicability of other laws.—
2766 (2) The following provisions of the Florida Insurance Code
2767 apply to captive insurance companies that who are not industrial
2768 insured captive insurance companies to the extent that such
2769 provisions are not inconsistent with this part:
2770 (a) Chapter 624, except for ss. 624.407, 624.408,
2771 624.4085, 624.40851, 624.4095, 624.411, 624.425, and 624.426.
2772 (b) Chapter 625, part II.
2773 (c) Chapter 626, part IX.
2774 (d) Sections 627.730-627.7405, when no-fault coverage is
2775 provided.
Page 111 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
2776 (e) Chapter 628.
2777 (3) The following provisions of the Florida Insurance Code
2778 shall apply to industrial insured captive insurance companies to
2779 the extent that such provisions are not inconsistent with this
2780 part:
2781 (a) Chapter 624, except for ss. 624.407, 624.408,
2782 624.4085, 624.40851, 624.4095, 624.411, 624.425, 624.426, and
2783 624.609(1).
2784 (b) Chapter 625, part II, if the industrial insured
2785 captive insurance company is incorporated in this state.
2786 (c) Chapter 626, part IX.
2787 (d) Sections 627.730-627.7405 when no-fault coverage is
2788 provided.
2789 (e) Chapter 628, except for ss. 628.341, 628.351, and
2790 628.6018.
2791 Section 57. Subsections (2), (6), and (7) of section
2792 705.184, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
2793 705.184 Derelict or abandoned motor vehicles on the
2794 premises of public-use airports.—
2795 (2) The airport director or the director's designee shall
2796 contact the Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles to
2797 notify that department that the airport has possession of the
2798 abandoned or derelict motor vehicle and to determine the name
2799 and address of the owner of the motor vehicle, the insurance
2800 company insuring the motor vehicle, notwithstanding the
Page 112 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
2801 provisions of s. 627.736, and any person who has filed a lien on
2802 the motor vehicle. Within 7 business days after receipt of the
2803 information, the director or the director's designee shall send
2804 notice by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the owner
2805 of the motor vehicle, the insurance company insuring the motor
2806 vehicle, notwithstanding the provisions of s. 627.736, and all
2807 persons of record claiming a lien against the motor vehicle. The
2808 notice must shall state the fact of possession of the motor
2809 vehicle, that charges for reasonable towing, storage, and
2810 parking fees, if any, have accrued and the amount thereof, that
2811 a lien as provided in subsection (6) will be claimed, that the
2812 lien is subject to enforcement pursuant to law, that the owner
2813 or lienholder, if any, has the right to a hearing as set forth
2814 in subsection (4), and that any motor vehicle which, at the end
2815 of 30 calendar days after receipt of the notice, has not been
2816 removed from the airport upon payment in full of all accrued
2817 charges for reasonable towing, storage, and parking fees, if
2818 any, may be disposed of as provided in s. 705.182(2)(a), (b),
2819 (d), or (e), including, but not limited to, the motor vehicle
2820 being sold free of all prior liens after 35 calendar days after
2821 the time the motor vehicle is stored if any prior liens on the
2822 motor vehicle are more than 5 years of age or after 50 calendar
2823 days after the time the motor vehicle is stored if any prior
2824 liens on the motor vehicle are 5 years of age or less.
2825 (6) The airport pursuant to this section or, if used, a
Page 113 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
2826 licensed independent wrecker company pursuant to s. 713.78 shall
2827 have a lien on an abandoned or derelict motor vehicle for all
2828 reasonable towing, storage, and accrued parking fees, if any,
2829 except that a no storage fee may not shall be charged if the
2830 motor vehicle is stored less than 6 hours. As a prerequisite to
2831 perfecting a lien under this section, the airport director or
2832 the director's designee must serve a notice in accordance with
2833 subsection (2) on the owner of the motor vehicle, the insurance
2834 company insuring the motor vehicle, notwithstanding the
2835 provisions of s. 627.736, and all persons of record claiming a
2836 lien against the motor vehicle. If attempts to notify the owner,
2837 the insurance company insuring the motor vehicle,
2838 notwithstanding the provisions of s. 627.736, or lienholders are
2839 not successful, the requirement of notice by mail is shall be
2840 considered met. Serving of the notice does not dispense with
2841 recording the claim of lien.
2842 (7)(a) For the purpose of perfecting its lien under this
2843 section, the airport shall record a claim of lien which states
2844 shall state:
2845 1. The name and address of the airport.
2846 2. The name of the owner of the motor vehicle, the
2847 insurance company insuring the motor vehicle, notwithstanding
2848 the provisions of s. 627.736, and all persons of record claiming
2849 a lien against the motor vehicle.
2850 3. The costs incurred from reasonable towing, storage, and
Page 114 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
2851 parking fees, if any.
2852 4. A description of the motor vehicle sufficient for
2853 identification.
2854 (b) The claim of lien must shall be signed and sworn to or
2855 affirmed by the airport director or the director's designee.
2856 (c) The claim of lien is shall be sufficient if it is in
2857 substantially the following form:
2858
2859 CLAIM OF LIEN
2860 State of ........
2861 County of ........
2862 Before me, the undersigned notary public, personally appeared
2863 ........, who was duly sworn and says that he/she is the
2864 ........ of ............, whose address is........; and that the
2865 following described motor vehicle:
2866 ...(Description of motor vehicle)...
2867 owned by ........, whose address is ........, has accrued
2868 $........ in fees for a reasonable tow, for storage, and for
2869 parking, if applicable; that the lienor served its notice to the
2870 owner, the insurance company insuring the motor vehicle
2871 notwithstanding the provisions of s. 627.736, Florida Statutes,
2872 and all persons of record claiming a lien against the motor
2873 vehicle on ...., ...(year)..., by.........
2874 ...(Signature)...
2875 Sworn to (or affirmed) and subscribed before me this .... day of
Page 115 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
2876 ...., ...(year)..., by ...(name of person making statement)....
2877 ...(Signature of Notary Public)... ...(Print, Type, or Stamp
2878 Commissioned name of Notary Public)...
2879 Personally Known....OR Produced....as identification.
2880
2881 However, the negligent inclusion or omission of any information
2882 in this claim of lien which does not prejudice the owner does
2883 not constitute a default that operates to defeat an otherwise
2884 valid lien.
2885 (d) The claim of lien must shall be served on the owner of
2886 the motor vehicle, the insurance company insuring the motor
2887 vehicle, notwithstanding the provisions of s. 627.736, and all
2888 persons of record claiming a lien against the motor vehicle. If
2889 attempts to notify the owner, the insurance company insuring the
2890 motor vehicle notwithstanding the provisions of s. 627.736, or
2891 lienholders are not successful, the requirement of notice by
2892 mail is shall be considered met. The claim of lien must shall be
2893 so served before recordation.
2894 (e) The claim of lien must shall be recorded with the
2895 clerk of court in the county where the airport is located. The
2896 recording of the claim of lien is shall be constructive notice
2897 to all persons of the contents and effect of such claim. The
2898 lien attaches shall attach at the time of recordation and takes
2899 shall take priority as of that time.
2900 Section 58. Paragraphs (a), (b), and (c) of subsection (4)
Page 116 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
2901 of section 713.78, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
2902 713.78 Liens for recovering, towing, or storing vehicles
2903 and vessels.—
2904 (4)(a) A towing-storage operator who comes into possession
2905 of a vehicle or vessel pursuant to paragraph (2)(b), and who
2906 claims a lien for recovery, towing, or storage services, must
2907 give notice, by certified mail, pursuant to subsection (16), to
2908 the registered owner, the insurance company insuring the vehicle
2909 or vessel notwithstanding s. 627.736, and all persons claiming a
2910 lien thereon, as disclosed by the records in the Department of
2911 Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles or as disclosed by the records
2912 of any corresponding agency in any other state in which the
2913 vehicle or vessel is identified through a records check of the
2914 National Motor Vehicle Title Information System or an equivalent
2915 commercially available system as being titled or registered.
2916 (b) When a law enforcement agency, county, or municipality
2917 authorizes the removal of a vehicle or vessel, or a towing
2918 service, garage, repair shop, or automotive service, storage, or
2919 parking place notifies a law enforcement agency of possession of
2920 a vehicle or vessel pursuant to s. 715.07(2)(a)2., if an
2921 approved third-party service cannot obtain the vehicle's or
2922 vessel's owner, lienholder, and insurer information or last
2923 state of record pursuant to subsection (16), then the person in
2924 charge of the towing service, garage, repair shop, or automotive
2925 service, storage, or parking place must request such information
Page 117 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
2926 from the law enforcement agency of the jurisdiction where the
2927 vehicle or vessel is stored. The law enforcement agency to which
2928 the request was made must contact the Department of Highway
2929 Safety and Motor Vehicles, or the appropriate agency of the
2930 state of registration, if known, within 24 hours through the
2931 medium of electronic communications, giving the full description
2932 of the vehicle or vessel. Upon receipt of the full description
2933 of the vehicle or vessel, the department must search its files
2934 to determine the owner's name, the insurance company insuring
2935 the vehicle or vessel, and whether any person has filed a lien
2936 upon the vehicle or vessel as provided in s. 319.27(2) and (3)
2937 and notify the applicable law enforcement agency within 72
2938 hours. The person in charge of the towing service, garage,
2939 repair shop, or automotive service, storage, or parking place
2940 must request such information from the applicable law
2941 enforcement agency within 5 days after the date of storage and
2942 must provide the information to the approved third-party service
2943 in order to transmit notices as required under subsection (16).
2944 The department may release the insurance company information to
2945 the requestor notwithstanding s. 627.736.
2946 (c) The notice of lien must be sent by an approved third-
2947 party service by certified mail to the registered owner, the
2948 insurance company insuring the vehicle notwithstanding s.
2949 627.736, and all other persons claiming a lien thereon within 5
2950 business days, excluding a Saturday, Sunday, or federal legal
Page 118 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
2951 holiday, after the date of storage of the vehicle or vessel. The
2952 notice must state all of the following:
2953 1. If the claim of lien is for a vehicle, the last 8
2954 digits of the vehicle identification number of the vehicle
2955 subject to the lien, or, if the claim of lien is for a vessel,
2956 the hull identification number of the vessel subject to the
2957 lien, clearly printed in the delivery address box and on the
2958 outside of the envelope sent to the registered owner and all
2959 other persons claiming an interest in or lien on the vehicle or
2960 vessel.
2961 2. The name, physical address, and telephone number of the
2962 lienor, and the entity name, as registered with the Division of
2963 Corporations, of the business where the towing and storage
2964 occurred, which must also appear on the outside of the envelope
2965 sent to the registered owner and all other persons claiming an
2966 interest in or lien on the vehicle or vessel.
2967 3. The fact of possession of the vehicle or vessel.
2968 4. The name of the person or entity that authorized the
2969 lienor to take possession of the vehicle or vessel.
2970 5. That a lien as provided in paragraph (2)(b) is claimed.
2971 6. That charges have accrued and include an itemized
2972 statement of the amount thereof.
2973 7. That the lien is subject to enforcement under law and
2974 that the owner or lienholder, if any, has the right to initiate
2975 judicial proceedings as set forth in subsection (5).
Page 119 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
2976 8. That any vehicle or vessel that remains unclaimed, or
2977 for which the charges for recovery, towing, or storage services
2978 remain unpaid, may be sold free of all prior liens 35 days after
2979 the vehicle or vessel is stored by the lienor if the vehicle or
2980 vessel is an older model or 57 days after the vehicle or vessel
2981 is stored by the lienor if the vehicle or vessel is a newer
2982 model.
2983 9. The address at which the vehicle or vessel is
2984 physically located.
2985 Section 59. Paragraph (a) of subsection (1), paragraph (c)
2986 of subsection (7), paragraphs (a), (b), and (c) of subsection
2987 (8), and subsections (9) and (10) of section 817.234, Florida
2988 Statutes, are amended to read:
2989 817.234 False and fraudulent insurance claims.—
2990 (1)(a) A person commits insurance fraud punishable as
2991 provided in subsection (11) if that person, with the intent to
2992 injure, defraud, or deceive any insurer:
2993 1. Presents or causes to be presented any written or oral
2994 statement as part of, or in support of, a claim for payment or
2995 other benefit pursuant to an insurance policy or a health
2996 maintenance organization subscriber or provider contract,
2997 knowing that such statement contains any false, incomplete, or
2998 misleading information concerning any fact or thing material to
2999 such claim;
3000 2. Prepares or makes any written or oral statement that is
Page 120 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
3001 intended to be presented to an any insurer in connection with,
3002 or in support of, any claim for payment or other benefit
3003 pursuant to an insurance policy or a health maintenance
3004 organization subscriber or provider contract, knowing that such
3005 statement contains any false, incomplete, or misleading
3006 information concerning any fact or thing material to such claim;
3007 3.a. Knowingly presents, causes to be presented, or
3008 prepares or makes with knowledge or belief that it will be
3009 presented to an any insurer, a purported insurer, a servicing
3010 corporation, an insurance broker, or an insurance agent, or any
3011 employee or agent thereof, any false, incomplete, or misleading
3012 information or a written or oral statement as part of, or in
3013 support of, an application for the issuance of, or the rating
3014 of, any insurance policy, or a health maintenance organization
3015 subscriber or provider contract; or
3016 b. Knowingly conceals information concerning any fact
3017 material to such application; or
3018 4. Knowingly presents, causes to be presented, or prepares
3019 or makes with knowledge or belief that it will be presented to
3020 any insurer a claim for payment or other benefit under medical
3021 payments coverage in a motor vehicle a personal injury
3022 protection insurance policy if the person knows that the payee
3023 knowingly submitted a false, misleading, or fraudulent
3024 application or other document when applying for licensure as a
3025 health care clinic, seeking an exemption from licensure as a
Page 121 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
3026 health care clinic, or demonstrating compliance with part X of
3027 chapter 400.
3028 (7)
3029 (c) An insurer, or any person acting at the direction of
3030 or on behalf of an insurer, may not change an opinion in a
3031 mental or physical report prepared under s. 627.736(7) or direct
3032 the physician preparing the report to change such opinion;
3033 however, this provision does not preclude the insurer from
3034 calling to the attention of the physician errors of fact in the
3035 report based upon information in the claim file. Any person who
3036 violates this paragraph commits a felony of the third degree,
3037 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
3038 (8)(a) It is unlawful for any person intending to defraud
3039 any other person to solicit or cause to be solicited any
3040 business from a person involved in a motor vehicle accident for
3041 the purpose of making, adjusting, or settling motor vehicle tort
3042 claims or claims for benefits under medical payments coverage in
3043 a motor vehicle insurance policy. A personal injury protection
3044 benefits required by s. 627.736. Any person who violates the
3045 provisions of this paragraph commits a felony of the second
3046 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s.
3047 775.084. A person who is convicted of a violation of this
3048 subsection must shall be sentenced to a minimum term of
3049 imprisonment of 2 years.
3050 (b) A person may not solicit or cause to be solicited any
Page 122 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
3051 business from a person involved in a motor vehicle accident by
3052 any means of communication other than advertising directed to
3053 the public for the purpose of making motor vehicle tort claims
3054 or claims for benefits under medical payments coverage in a
3055 motor vehicle insurance policy personal injury protection
3056 benefits required by s. 627.736, within 60 days after the
3057 occurrence of the motor vehicle accident. A Any person who
3058 violates this paragraph commits a felony of the third degree,
3059 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
3060 (c) A lawyer, health care practitioner as defined in s.
3061 456.001, or owner or medical director of a clinic required to be
3062 licensed pursuant to s. 400.9905 may not, at any time after 60
3063 days have elapsed from the occurrence of a motor vehicle
3064 accident, solicit or cause to be solicited any business from a
3065 person involved in a motor vehicle accident by means of in
3066 person or telephone contact at the person's residence, for the
3067 purpose of making motor vehicle tort claims or claims for
3068 benefits under medical payments coverage in a motor vehicle
3069 insurance policy. A personal injury protection benefits required
3070 by s. 627.736. Any person who violates this paragraph commits a
3071 felony of the third degree, punishable as provided in s.
3072 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
3073 (9) A person may not organize, plan, or knowingly
3074 participate in an intentional motor vehicle crash or a scheme to
3075 create documentation of a motor vehicle crash that did not occur
Page 123 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 769 2026
3076 for the purpose of making motor vehicle tort claims or claims
3077 for benefits under medical payments coverage in a motor vehicle
3078 insurance policy. A personal injury protection benefits as
3079 required by s. 627.736. Any person who violates this subsection
3080 commits a felony of the second degree, punishable as provided in
3081 s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. A person who is convicted
3082 of a violation of this subsection must shall be sentenced to a
3083 minimum term of imprisonment of 2 years.
3084 (10) A licensed health care practitioner who is found
3085 guilty of insurance fraud under this section for an act relating
3086 to a motor vehicle personal injury protection insurance policy
3087 must lose loses his or her license to practice for 5 years and
3088 may not receive reimbursement under medical payments coverage in
3089 a motor vehicle insurance policy for personal injury protection
3090 benefits for 10 years from the date that his or her license is
3091 suspended.
3092 Section 60. For the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the sum of
3093 $83,651 in nonrecurring funds is appropriated from the Insurance
3094 Regulatory Trust Fund to the Office of Insurance Regulation for
3095 the purpose of implementing this act. This section shall take
3096 effect January 1, 2027.
3097 Section 61. Except as otherwise expressly provided in this
3098 act and except for this section, which shall take effect upon
3099 this act becoming a law, this act shall take effect January 1,
3100 2027.
Page 124 of 124
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb769-00